S.  HRG.  109–595

THE  PRESIDENT’S  FISCAL  YEAR  2006  BUDGET 
REQUEST 
OF
HOMELAND  SECURITY  ADMINISTRATION  AND 
RELATED  PROGRAMS

DEPARTMENT 

FOR 

THE 

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  26,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

30–055 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 26, 2005 ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Ensign ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barclay,  Charles,  A.A.E.;  on  behalf  of  the  American  Association  of  Airport 
Executives/Airports Council International-North America ..............................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
May, James C., President/CEO, Air Transport Association of America, Inc. .....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Letter, dated April 25, 2005, to Hon. Ted Stevens and Hon. Daniel K. Inouye 
from: Marc Rotenberg, Executive Director; Marcia Hofmann, Director, Open 
Government  Project;  and  Melissa  Ngo,  Staff  Counsel,  Electronic  Privacy 
Information Center (EPIC) ..................................................................................

Page 
1
18
1
1
20
22
1

4
5
11
13

27

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

THE  PRESIDENT’S  FISCAL  YEAR  2006  BUDGET 
REQUEST  FOR  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF 
HOMELAND  SECURITY  ADMINISTRATION 
AND  RELATED  PROGRAMS 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  26,  2005

SENATE COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE AND 
TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  There  are  a  few  extra-curricular  activities  going 
on around here today, but we’d like to start the hearing, if we may. 
We want to welcome back the witnesses who were scheduled to ap-
pear  on  February  15th.  Today’s  focus  will  be  on  the  effect  of  the 
Fiscal  Year  2006  Transportation  and  Security  Agency  budget  re-
quest on the aviation industry and the American economy. 

Now, some time ago, 15 members of our Committee signed a let-
ter to the Appropriations Committee requesting that the passenger 
fee  increase  not  be  included  in  the  Homeland  Security  Appropria-
tions bill. Chairman Gregg is aware of our concerns, and has raised 
similar  issues  in  the  Appropriations  hearings.  We  look  forward  to 
learning  more  about  the  impact  of  this  proposal  from  our  wit-
nesses. 

Let me yield to Senator Inouye at this time. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  a  prepared 

statement I’d like to have made part of the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. It will be. 
Senator INOUYE. May I just say that I concur with you, and I was 
1  of  the  15  who  signed  the  letter  in  opposition  of  the  security  fee. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Mr. Chairman, as we begin this new session, I rank our oversight of the Transpor-
tation Security Administration as one of our highest priorities. As the primary Com-
mittee  of  jurisdiction  for  transportation  security,  I’m  looking  forward  to  a  spirited 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

2

and  consistent  review  of  TSA’s  work  as  we  continue  to  make  progress  securing  all 
modes of transportation. 

I have three principal areas of concern:

1)  Congress  agreed  in  2001,  by  nearly  unanimous  votes  in  the  House  and  Sen-
ate, that transportation security must be a national security function. However, 
between  TSA’s  endless  reorganizations  and  the  recent  rhetoric  about  returning 
to  private  security  screening  companies,  it  is  becoming  apparent  that  this  cen-
tral, guiding principle is being eroded. If we lose sight of this principle, we will 
forget one of the most important lessons of September 11th.
2)  Aviation  security  has  received  90  percent  of  TSA’s  funds  and  virtually  all  of 
its attention. There is simply not enough being done to address port, rail, motor 
carrier, hazardous material, and pipeline safety. That must change, quickly.
3)  The  Administration  is  proposing  to  increase  aviation  security  fees.  This 
makes  no  sense  to  me.  The  airline  industry  is  bordering  on  total  bankruptcy, 
and the Administration wants to add to its costs. Yet at the same time, the Ad-
ministration  is  demanding  that  its  unaffordable  tax  cuts  be  made  permanent. 
I don’t follow their thinking, and quite frankly, I don’t believe the proposal will 
go far.

Mr. Chairman, over the years, and particularly since 9/11, this Committee has led 
the effort to make transportation security a matter of national security. We crafted 
two  landmark  bills,  the  Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  of  2001  and  the 
Maritime Transportation Security Act of 2002, to ensure that funding and programs 
were  developed  to  completely  change  the  way  we  address  security.  The  September 
11th  tragedy,  the  Madrid  train  bombing  and  many  other  attacks  remain  locked  in 
our conscience as we try to do all we can to avoid another attack. 

The continued threat risk is real and the vulnerabilities are real, across all modes 

of transportation. 

We  recently  witnessed  a  rail  tank  cargo  accident—not  a  terrorist  attack—in 
Graniteville,  SC.  An  entire  town  had  to  be  evacuated,  demonstrating  the  potential 
harm  if  someone  does  target  a  rail  tank  car.  The  District  of  Columbia  was  so  con-
cerned about rail cars carrying hazardous materials traversing the city, they adopt-
ed a resolution to ban them. 

Port  security  is  of  particular  interest  to  me.  My  state  of  Hawaii  is  entirely  de-
pendent  upon  shipping  and  the  steady  flow  of  maritime  commerce.  The  dock  strike 
at  the  port  of  LA/Long  Beach  in  2001  caused  people  in  my  state  to  begin  running 
out of basic supplies. If an attack occurs, it could be weeks before service is renewed. 
It  is  important  to  remember  that  95  percent  of  the  Nation’s  cargo  comes  through 
the  ports,  so  a  port  incident  will  send  devastating  shockwaves  through  the  entire 
economy, impacting every state. Yet the security initiatives at most ports have been, 
to  this  point,  woefully  underfunded,  and  most  ports  are  ill-prepared  for  an  attack. 
Unfortunately,  our  maritime  system  is  only  as  strong  as  its  weakest  link.  If  there 
is an incident at any one port, the whole system will screech to a halt, as we scram-
ble to ensure security at other ports. If we had to shut down our entire port system, 
the  economic  damage  would  be  widespread,  catastrophic  and  possibly  irreversible. 
Considering these simple observations, I cannot comprehend the Administration’s 
lack of serious attention and commitment to port, rail, motor carrier, hazardous ma-
terial and pipeline safety initiatives. 

Security  funding  for  all  modes  of  transportation  beyond  aviation  has  been  des-
perately  lacking.  The  9/11  Commission  found,  ‘‘over  90  percent  of  the  Nation’s  $5.3 
billion  annual  investment  in  the  TSA  goes  to  aviation . . . [and] . . . current  ef-
forts  do  not  yet  reflect  a  forward-looking  strategic  plan.’’  And  according  to  Senate 
Banking Committee estimates, the Federal Government has spent $9.16 per airline 
passenger  each  year  on  enhanced  security  measures,  while  spending  less  than  a 
penny  annually  per  person  on  security  measures  for  other  modes  of  transportation. 
But considering the real threat risk and the constant talk about our War on Ter-
ror, I find it even harder to understand how the Administration has forgotten that, 
in a post-September 11th world, transportation security is national security. 

Based on the President’s Budget, there are apparently some in the Administration 
who seem to believe that our work is done. Their budget proposal suggests a whole-
sale dismantling of the Transportation Security Administration. In the last 2 years, 
we have witnessed a near constant reorganization that, under the current proposal, 
now  makes  Maritime  and  Land  security  virtually  nonexistent  at  TSA.  The  changes 
suggest  either  a  fundamental  lack  of  understanding  of  what  it  will  take  to  ensure 
the security of all transportation modes, bureaucratic mismanagement, or worse yet, 
the Administration’s complete loss of a sense of national urgency. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

3

The  President’s  Budget  recommends  shifting  critical  work  away  from  the  Trans-
portation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  to  other  organizations  within  DHS  that 
have  neither  the  expertise  nor  the  necessary  authority  to  be  effective.  In  my  view, 
further decentralizing the responsibilities of TSA will destroy the remaining, limited 
accountability that TSA provides for transportation security. 

The  problems  with  the  Budget  proposal  go  further:  it  offers  inadequate  funding 
for  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  to  meet  both  its  increased  homeland  security  responsibil-
ities  and  its  traditional  missions  like  search  and  rescue  and  enforcement  of  coastal 
laws; it creates an odd rearrangement of the security grant programs that not only 
defies  Congressional  directives,  but  adds  bureaucracy  and  decreases  accountability; 
it cedes TSA’s regulatory authority of the Transportation Worker Identification Cre-
dential (TWIC) program; and the list goes on. 

On  aviation  security,  the  Administration’s  proposal  creates  as  many  problems  as 
it  aims  to  solve.  While  TSA  spending  in  FY06  would  increase  by  $156  million,  this 
funding level depends on $1.5 billion generated by increased security fees on airline 
passengers.  Since  this  proposal  was  unveiled,  there  has  been  no  shortage  of  airline 
and  industry  analysts  that  have  raised  deep  concerns  over  what  effect  this  may 
have on the future of existing air carriers. 

The  Administration  cannot  satisfy  its  budget  needs  on  the  backs  of  one  industry. 
I know that several other countries and airport authorities impose security fees, but 
with  perhaps  one  or  two  small  exceptions,  no  one  imposes  all  of  the  national  secu-
rity costs on the airlines. We can debate how much we need for security, but it does 
not make any sense to place the burden for new DHS revenue on an airline industry 
that  is  bordering  on  total  bankruptcy,  when  at  the  same  time  the  Administration 
is demanding that its unaffordable tax cuts be made permanent. 

The  U.S.  economy  depends  on  a  strong  commercial  aviation  industry.  Since  Sep-
tember 11th, the U.S. air carriers have taken unprecedented steps to cut their costs, 
and  their  employees  have  been  true  heros.  In  the  face  of  steep  layoffs  and  cuts  in 
pay  and  benefits,  the  workers  have  been  selflessly  supportive  of  the  industry  and 
still  manage  to  provide  the  highest  level  of  service  possible  day  in  and  day  out.  I 
think  we  must  be  very  careful  in  dealing  with  issues  that  will  have  wide  ramifica-
tions for the aviation industry and its workers. 

TSA  should  be  aggressively  seeking  improvements  to  the  current  transportation 
security regimes for all modes and promoting the technological and capital improve-
ments  that  will  save  considerable  money  in  the  long  run  while  improving  security. 
Instead, we have been given a budget that seeks short-term solutions that, I believe, 
will have negative consequences in the long term. 

Given the many misplaced priorities that I see in the President’s Budget proposal, 

it is clear that the Congress needs to help refocus the Department. 

I  have  been  discussing  the  real  needs  of  the  U.S.  transportation  security  system 
with my fellow Committee members, and we have been developing a transportation 
security  reauthorization  proposal  to  provide  further  direction  to  the  Department’s 
cargo security functions, to strengthen aviation, maritime, rail, hazardous materials, 
and pipeline security efforts, and enhance interagency cooperation. The proposal will 
incorporate several Commerce Committee-reported and Senate-passed bills from the 
prior Congress and will also put forth new ideas to enhance transportation security 
across all modes of transportation. 

of defense—be it an airport screener or a seaport agent;

We expect a fully funded, effective operating Administration that can:
• Provide  security  to  the  traveling  public  and  instill  confidence  in  the  first  line 
• Establish secure, efficient cargo systems for air, land and sea;
• Deter people that seek to do harm.
It  is  easy  to  set  the  goals,  but  often  difficult  to  achieve  them.  I  speak  for  my  col-
leagues when I say that this Committee is fully committed to achieving these goals. 
And we have a record that demonstrates our ability to deliver a bipartisan, broadly 
supported result. 

The  difficult  work  of  securing  all  of  our  major  modes  of  transportation,  including 
our ports, railroads, intercity buses, pipelines, and motor carriers, is just beginning 
and the country demand a robust agency within DHS dedicated to that task. 

I thank the witnesses for their participation and I look forward to their testimony.

The CHAIRMAN. May we have the witnesses, Mr. Barclay and Mr. 
May, come to the witness table. If it’s agreeable, we’ll put the state-
ments in the record, if anyone has statements, and proceed to this 
hearing. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

4

As I said, these are the gentlemen who waited for us at the pre-
vious  hearing,  and  we  didn’t  get  to  them,  so  we  agreed  to  have  a 
hearing so we can put into the record their comments. 

Chip, let’s call on you first. 

STATEMENT  OF  CHARLES  BARCLAY,  A.A.E.;  ON  BEHALF  OF 
THE  AMERICAN  ASSOCIATION  OF  AIRPORT  EXECUTIVES/
AIRPORTS COUNCIL INTERNATIONAL–NORTH AMERICA 
Mr. BARCLAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
It’s  always  a  personal  pleasure  to  appear  before  the  Commerce 
Committee,  airports  are  grateful  for  the  Full  Committee  focus  on 
transportation security, and thankful for the exceptional experience 
and  knowledge  that  the  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member  bring  to 
the  Committee  leadership  at  this  critical  time  for  our  industry.  I’d 
also  like  to  thank  former  Chairman  McCain  for  his  leadership 
through  one  of  the  most  difficult  periods  in  our  industry’s  history. 
I want to discuss just three quick points on the TSA budget from 
our  testimony,  but  given  their  critical  nature,  I’d  like  to  first  pref-
ace  those  remarks  by  saying  that  we  appreciate  very  much  the 
leadership  at  DHS,  and  TSA,  and  the  service  of  all  the  men  and 
women of TSA. 

Our  members  have  formed  important  partnerships  with  TSA, 
both locally and nationally. We’ve solved a number of difficult prob-
lems with TSA, and we have some important policy disagreements, 
a few of which I want to talk about today. 

First,  nothing  frustrates  our  members  more  than  seeing  a  cost 
increase  being  sold  as  a  budget  cut.  Every  time  we  incur  the  cap-
ital  cost  of  building  in-line  explosive  detection  systems  at  airports, 
the  operating  cost  savings  that  TSA  realizes  in  personnel,  pays  off 
that  capital  cost  exceptionally  quickly,  just  over  a  year,  according 
to GAO’s analysis. And then that savings continues on into the fu-
ture for TSA. 

The  Administration’s  proposed  cut  in  LOIs  for  EDS  installations 
is  just  not  smart  government.  It  may  be  clever  Federal  budgeting 
in the very, very, very short term, but in the real world of economic 
effects,  it  increases  TSA’s  costs,  rather  than  lowering  them.  Smart 
government would be to increase LOIs and earn the permanent re-
duction  in  TSA’s  costs  that  that  brings,  and  our  testimony  has  a 
number of examples of how that occurs. 

Second,  airports  also  disagree  with  the  Administration  proposal 
to  increase  security  fees.  Fighting  a  war  on  terrorism  isn’t  the  job 
of  one  industry  that  happens  to  be  a  popular  target  of  terrorists 
due  to  its  importance  to  our  modern  economy.  Certainly  users  of 
any  industry  should  pay  for  the  costs  they  impose,  but  wars  need 
to  be  fought  by  nations,  not  unlucky  target  industries.  We  think 
this  user  fee  proposal  gets  that  allocation  philosophy  wrong,  and 
we would also question the wisdom of the timing of this proposal’s 
impact on a seriously financially ailing industry. 

Third,  Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  pointed  out  in  the  new  Secretary’s 
confirmation  hearings  earlier  this  year,  DHS  cannot  keep  looking 
forward  to  ever-increasing  funding  to  carry  out  all  the  missions 
that  are  on  their  plate.  Airports  agree,  and  we  have  more  to  offer 
than just criticism of the Administration’s proposed budget cuts. As 
branches  of  local  governments,  with  local  law  enforcement  powers, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

5

and local police divisions, airports are willing and able to share se-
curity responsibilities. TSA and local law enforcement need to allo-
cate more responsibilities through local mutual aid pacts, as occurs 
throughout  the  law  enforcement  field,  rather  than  spending  our 
time  focused  on  each  other  as  regulator  and  regulated  party.  We 
should both be pointed outward, looking for the bad actors, not in-
ward  watching  each  other.  This  simply  takes  the  allocation  of  log-
ical  responsibilities  among  law  enforcement  agencies,  rather  than 
a  regulatory  approach.  Some  responsibilities  have  been  allocated. 
They’ve  saved  TSA  money.  Our  members  tell  us  that  more  can  be 
saved  by  operating  precisely  as  multiple  law  enforcement  agencies 
do, outside the boundaries of an airport. 

In closing, I’d like to mention the airports’ strong objection to an-
other  Administration-proposed  budget  cut  that’s  part  of  this  Com-
mittee’s  jurisdiction,  even  though  it’s  not  subject  to  today’s  hear-
ing—the  exceptionally  large  proposed  cut  for  the  Airport  Improve-
ment  Program  would  hit  small  airports  and  small  airport  states 
which  can  least  afford  it—the  hardest.  Larger  airports  would  be 
forced  to  choose  between  offering  inadequate  future  capacity,  or 
passing  new  costs  on  to  financially  ailing  tenants  when  they  can 
least afford it. 

We understand the need to cut the Federal deficit, and the moral 
imperative not to pass along debts to future generations, simply be-
cause  we  wanted  to  consume  more  than  we  could  produce.  But 
there is an equal imperative to pass along and invest in infrastruc-
ture  that  will  allow  those  future  economies  to  grow  and  prosper. 
Public  infrastructure  facilities  that  create  wealth  over  their  full, 
useful  life  are—we  respectfully  submit—the  wrong  places  to  cut. 
We  owe  it  to  future  generations  not  to  leave  them  broke,  and  we 
owe it to them not to leave them with broken infrastructure. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I’ll  be  happy  to  answer  any  questions  that  I  can. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Barclay follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHARLES BARCLAY,  A.A.E.;  ON BEHALF OF THE AMERICAN 
ASSOCIATION OF AIRPORT EXECUTIVES/AIRPORTS COUNCIL INTERNATIONAL-NORTH 
AMERICA 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  share  with  the  Committee  the  views  of  the  air-
port  community  on  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  for  the  Trans-
portation  Security  Administration.  I  am  testifying  today  on  behalf  of  the  American 
Association  of  Airport  Executives  (AAAE),  Airports  Council  International—North 
America (ACI–NA), and our Airport Legislative Alliance, a joint legislative advocacy 
organization. AAAE represents the men and women who manage primary, commer-
cial  service,  reliever,  and  general  aviation  airports.  ACI–NA  represents  local,  re-
gional  and  state  governing  bodies  that  own  and  operate  commercial  airports  in  the 
United States, and Canada. 

Before  moving  to  some  of  our  specific  thoughts  and  concerns  on  the  TSA  budget, 
I  would  be  remiss  if  I  didn’t  take  the  opportunity  to  tell  you  how  delighted  we  are 
to be working with you, Chairman Stevens, as well as with Senator Inouye and the 
other distinguished Members of this Committee during this Congress to address the 
wide range of challenges facing the aviation industry. The depth of experience, par-
ticularly  on  the  part  of  the  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member  of  this  Committee,  is 
unparalleled, and we look forward to having those talents at work on the important 
issues before us all. 

I  also  want  to  commend  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  focusing  attention  on  the  TSA 
budget  so  early  in  the  process.  In  a  world  of  limited  resources,  it  is  absolutely  crit-
ical  that  the  TSA  establish  priorities  within  its  budget  that  enable  the  agency  to 
meet its core mission, offer the greatest benefits in terms of enhanced security, and 
effectively utilize taxpayer dollars. At a recent hearing before the Senate Homeland 
Security and Governmental Affairs Committee, Chairman Stevens, you said that the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

6

Department of Homeland Security needed to focus on doing more with the resources 
it  has  been  given  rather  than  relying  on  ever  increasing  budget  allocations.  Recog-
nizing  that  there  are  limits  to  the  amount  of  funding  DHS  and  TSA  will  receive, 
it is imperative that TSA’s provision of aviation services be made more efficient. Un-
fortunately,  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  does  not  meet  this  test.  It  re-
mains  silent  on  the  critical  issue  of  more  efficiently  managing  checked  baggage 
screening,  it  reduces  the  general  fund  support  available  for  aviation  security,  and 
proposes  to  pass  along  a  $1.5  billion  bill  to  the  travelers  who  use  our  Nation’s  air-
ports. 

The  airport  community,  backed  by  a  recommendation  of  the  9/11  Commission, 
continues  to  believe  that  TSA  can  realize  important  savings  if  they  would  quickly 
move  forward  with  the  permanent  installation  of  in-line  explosive  detection  equip-
ment in airports. Other personnel savings can be achieved through the rapid devel-
opment, certification, and deployment of new technology. More can be done to focus 
on dangerous people rather than dangerous things so that the most effective screen-
ing takes place before a suspect individual ever has access to critical transportation 
assets. More can be done also by reducing the TSA’s plethora of non-screening, over-
head,  liaison,  and  regulatory  personnel  who  occupy  offices  at  just  about  every  com-
mercial  airport  in  the  U.S.  and  some  international  locations  as  well.  TSA  and  the 
department  can  also  avoid  unnecessary  duplication  and  costly  delays  on  key  pro-
grams  like  Registered  Traveler  by  working  more  closely  with  its  industry  partners. 
Additionally, TSA can be more proactive in partnering with airports and deferring 
to  them  to  address  security  concerns  such  as  perimeter  security  and  access  control, 
for  which  local  airport  operators  have  superior  expertise  and  experience  as  well  as 
ongoing  responsibilities.  Keeping  these  traditionally  local  duties  in  local  hands  al-
lows  TSA  to  leverage  airport  and  local  resources  and  enables  the  agency  to  better 
focus  on  its  core  missions  of  baggage  and  passenger  screening  and  providing  intel-
ligence to local law enforcement. 
EDS Installation: In-Line Systems Enhance Security and Reduce Personnel 

Requirements 

The greatest area of opportunity in terms of enhanced security and potential long-
term TSA budget savings comes from the permanent installation of explosive detec-
tion  equipment  in  the  Nation’s  airports.  In  order  to  meet  Congressional  deadlines 
to screen all checked baggage placed aboard commercial aircraft, TSA quickly placed 
thousands  of  explosive  detection  system  (EDS)  and  explosive  trace  detection  (ETD) 
machines  in  airports  across  the  country.  Many  of  those  machines  have  been  placed 
in  airport  ticketing  lobbies  without  the  kinds  of  integrated  approaches  that  take 
maximum  advantage  of  their  certified  throughputs  and  alarm  reconciliation  capa-
bilities.  The  result,  too  often,  is  crowded  airport  lobbies  (a  safety  and  security  haz-
ard),  major  backups  at  a  number  of  security  screening  checkpoints,  and  a  huge  in-
crease in the number of TSA personnel necessary to operate the equipment. 

While virtually everyone agrees that the best solution at many airports is to move 
EDS  equipment  from  crowded  lobbies  and  place  it  ‘‘in-line’’  as  part  of  an  airport’s 
integrated  baggage  system,  making  the  necessary  changes  at  airports—reinforcing 
flooring, electrical upgrades, building new facilities, etc.—are neither easy nor inex-
pensive. Current cost estimates run in the $4 billion to $5 billion range for airports 
nationwide. These upfront capital costs are modest, however, when compared to the 
extraordinary  expenses  necessary  to  pay  for  literally  thousands  of  extra  screeners 
year  after  year  using  today’s  model.  In-line  screening,  in  airports  such  as  Tampa 
International  Airport,  has  also  been  shown  to  reduce  the  rate  of  TSA  screener  on-
the-job  injuries.  The  handful  of  airports  that  currently  have  ‘‘in-line’’  baggage  sys-
tems  report  that  they  have  paid  for  themselves  with  personnel  cost  reductions  in 
as little as 16 months. 

The  case  of  the  Lexington  Blue  Grass  Airport  in  Lexington,  Kentucky,  offers  a 
perfect  example.  In  Lexington,  a  $3.5  million  investment  to  make  the  terminal 
modifications  necessary  to  establish  an  in-line  baggage  system  instead  of  the  ter-
minal  lobby  explosive  trace  detection  (ETD)  protocol  that  was  offered  as  an  alter-
native  has  resulted  in  annual  personnel  savings  of  more  than  $3  million.  The  TSA 
has  been  able  to  use  four  screeners  for  the  in-line  system  per  shift  rather  than  the 
30  that  would  have  been  necessary  for  primary  checked  bag  screening  using  the 
ETD  configuration.  In  addition,  the  in-line  EDS  option  in  Lexington  allows  for  re-
duced  congestion  in  terminal  areas,  a  result  that  improves  security  and  enhances 
passenger  convenience.  Large  airports  stand  ready  to  achieve  even  bigger  gains. 
Modeling in San Francisco, for example, shows savings of tens of millions of dollars 
annually for an in-line EDS solution. 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  in  its  February  15  appearance  before  the 
Committee noted that at the nine airports where the TSA has issued Letters of In-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

7

tent  (LOIs)  to  begin  moving  EDS  equipment  in-line,  the  agency  estimates  that  the 
move will save the Federal Government $1.3 billion over seven years and that TSA 
will  recover  its  initial  investment  in  in-line  systems  at  those  airports  in  just  over 
a  year.  GAO  further  noted  that  in-line  EDS  systems  at  those  nine  airports  will  re-
duce  by  78  percent  the  number  of  TSA  baggage  screeners  and  supervisors  required 
to screen checked baggage from 6,645 to 1,477. 

Through  Fiscal  Year  2005,  Congress  has  appropriated  $1.783  billion  for  EDS-re-
lated terminal modifications, although significant portions of those funds were used 
by  TSA  on  the  short-term  challenges  associated  with  getting  EDS  machines  in  air-
ports to meet the original statutory deadlines. Conservative estimates show that the 
Federal  Government  needs  to  commit  a  total  of  $4  billion  to  $5  billion  to  get  the 
job  done  at  airports  that  require  these  solutions.  The  Federal  Government  has  met 
less than half of that need since September 11. 

Unfortunately,  the  prospects  for  quickly  addressing  the  existing  funding  gap  re-
main bleak. The TSA budget request for FY 2006 calls for only $250 million for EDS 
installation projects, the amount mandated in law by VISION–100 FAA reauthoriza-
tion  legislation.  While  $250  million  is  certainly  a  significant  amount  of  money,  the 
fact is that it will allow TSA to move forward at only a handful of airports. 

TSA has estimated that roughly $240.5 million of the $250 million requested will 
be  used  to  meet  existing  commitments  at  the  nine  airports  covered  by  the  existing 
eight LOIs with the agency (the LOI for Los Angeles World Airports covers both Los 
Angeles International Airport and Ontario International Airport). The $240.5 figure 
assume  that  the  agency  is  allowed  once  again  to  ignore  provisions  in  law  that  re-
quire  the  Federal  Government  to  pay  for  90  percent  of  the  costs  of  those  projects, 
otherwise it will be much higher. 

As  you  recall,  the  LOI  process  allows  interested  airports  to  provide  immediate 
funding for key projects with a promise that the Federal Government will reimburse 
the  airport  for  those  expenses  over  several  years.  At  Dallas-Fort  Worth  Inter-
national  Airport,  for  example,  the  airport  used  its  strong  rating  in  the  financial 
market  to  leverage  the  LOI  and  to  issue  bonds  to  install  these  systems.  This  ap-
proach  takes  advantage  of  professional  airport  management  capabilities  and  maxi-
mizes  the  use  of  limited  Federal  resources  to  ensure  that  key  construction  projects 
get underway as soon as possible. 

Under  the  LOI  process,  the  Federal  Government  has  committed  to  reimbursing 
airports  for  these  projects  over  a  three-  to  five-year  period.  The  following  lists  the 
LOI airports and the total project cost at those airports:

LOI Airports 

Airport 

Atlanta 
Boston Logan 
Dallas/Fort Worth 
Denver International 
Las Vegas McCarran 
Los Angeles/Ontario 
Phoenix 
Seattle/Tacoma 

Total LOI Airports: 

Total Cost 

$125 million 
$116 million 
$139 million 
$95 million 
$125 million 
$342 million 
$122 million 
$212 million

$1.276 billion 

Although  airports  contend  that  the  cost  of  these  projects  should  be  met  entirely 
by the Federal Government, given its direct responsibility for baggage screening es-
tablished  in  law,  in  light  of  the  national  security  imperative  for  doing  so,  and  be-
cause  of  the  economic  efficiencies  of  this  strategy,  airports  have  agreed  to  provide 
a  local  match  of  10  percent  in  the  case  of  large  and  medium  hubs  and  5  percent 
for smaller airports. We continue to strongly oppose proposals by the Administration 
to  dramatically  increase  the  local  share  beyond  the  levels  established  in  VISION–
100. 

While  the  projects  at  those  eight  airports  are  necessary,  critical,  and  a  top  pri-
ority, the simple fact of the matter is that incremental installments of $250 million 
a  year  will  not  get  projects  started  at  additional  airports  in  the  foreseeable  future. 
Clearly,  more  resources  are  needed  to  address  the  dozens  of  other  airports  that  do 
not currently have LOIs with the TSA. To give the Committee an idea of the scope 
of  current  needs  that  exist  beyond  the  LOI  airports,  we  have  included  the  latest 
data  we  have  from  a  number  of  airports  that  have  identified  EDS  installation  as 
a major challenge facing their facility.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

8

Airports Currently Without Funding in Place for EDS Installation 

Airport 

Albuquerque 
Anchorage 
Biloxi 
Bismarck 
Bradley 
BWI 
Charlotte 
Chicago Midway/O’Hare 
Cincinnati 
Cleveland 
Colorado Springs 
Detroit 
Elgin AFB 
El Paso 
Ft. Lauderdale 
Grand Rapids 
Guam 
Honolulu/Kahului 
Houston 
Jackson 
John Wayne 
Kansas City 
Memphis 
Miami 
Milwaukee 
Minneapolis/St. Paul 
Nashville 
Newark 
New Orleans 
New York LaGuardia 
New York JFK 
Oakland 
Omaha 
Orlando 
Palm Beach 
Panama City 
Philadelphia 
Portland 
Port Columbus 
Providence 
Raleigh-Durham 
Richmond 
Rochester 
St. Louis 
St. Thomas 
Salt Lake City 
San Antonio 
San Diego 
San Francisco 
San Jose 
San Juan 
SW Florida 
Tampa 
Tucson 
Washington Dulles 
Washington Reagan National 

Total: 

Project Cost
Estimate 

$48 million 
$27 million 
$5 million 
$20 million 
$35 million 
$65 million 
$40 million 
$90 million 
$20 million 
$45 million 
$15 million 
$100 million 
$2 million 
$15 million 
$85 million 
$20 million 
$14 million 
$78 million 
$115 million 
$9 million 
$12 million 
$34 million 
$42 million 
$200 million 
$35 million 
$30 million 
$40 million 
$99 million 
$14 million 
$98 million 
$250 million 
$30 million 
$18 million 
$140 million 
$30 million 
$10 million 
$65 million 
$45 million 
$22 million 
$38 million 
$40 million 
$30 million 
$10 million 
$90 million 
$10 million 
$20 million 
$40 million 
$20 million 
$22 million 
$172 million 
$130 million 
$28 million 
$124 million 
$10 million 
$121 million 
$52 million

$3.019 billion 

We  believe  that  there  are  dozens  of  additional  airports  not  listed  here  that  have 
yet  to  develop  comprehensive  cost  estimates  or  that  have  not  responded  to  our  re-
quests for information. 

Despite  these  overwhelming  needs,  the  Federal  Government  does  not  yet  have  a 
long-term  EDS  solution  at  a  significant  number  of  airports  across  the  country.  The 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

9

TSA’s  task  has  not  been  made  any  easier  by  opposition  from  the  Office  of  Manage-
ment  and  Budget  (OMB)  to  the  issuance  of  additional  LOIs  to  airports  for  these 
projects.  It  is  our  sincere  hope  that  OMB  will  quickly  move  past  what  we  believe 
is a short-sighted view of this problem and focus on the long-term benefits that can 
be achieved by immediately investing to make the terminal modifications necessary 
to accommodate EDS equipment. 

In-line  systems  require  up-front  capital  expenditures,  but  they  pay  for  themselves 
in  short-order  through  major  reductions  in  personnel  costs.  This  is  an  example  of 
budget rules that are ‘‘penny-wise and pound foolish.’’ One need only look to the real-
world  example  of  the  dozen  or  so  airports  where  EDS  systems  have  been  properly 
installed  to  get  real  examples  of  the  dramatic  personnel  savings  that  can  be 
achieved by moving forward with these projects. We appreciate the interest that you 
and  Senator  Inouye  have  shown  in  this  problem,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  we  look  for-
ward to continuing our work together to find creative approaches to addressing the 
existing EDS installation funding shortfall. Airports stand ready to support the LOI 
process  and  airport  managers  have  repeatedly  expressed  to  TSA  their  ability  to  ac-
commodate a wide variety of financing options to help the Federal Government ful-
fill its responsibility. 

Beyond additional resources, we urge TSA to continue its work with airport opera-
tors and managers to ensure that proposed solutions and changes are really the best 
course  at  an  individual  facility.  Airport  professionals  understand  the  configuration 
and layout of their facilities better than anyone and are uniquely suited to highlight 
where  pitfalls  lie  and  where  opportunities  exist.  In  addition,  TSA  must  continue  to 
work with airport operators to optimize the use of limited space in airport facilities 
and to pay airports for the agency’s use of space in accordance with the law. 

Airports are pleased to see funding in the TSA budget request for ongoing mainte-
nance  of  EDS  machines.  As  the  machines  age  and  as  their  use  continues  to  grow 
and their warranties expire, it is critical that funding is provided to keep the exist-
ing machines in operation and to restore machines that fail. 
Encouraging Development and Deployment of New Technology 

In  addition  to  investing  in  necessary  infrastructure  improvements  and  mainte-
nance, the Federal Government needs to look toward the promise of new technology 
and invest in making those promises a reality. We remain convinced that there are 
a  number  of  additional  applications  for  new  technology  to  improve  baggage  screen-
ing,  for  example.  The  key  is  for  the  Federal  Government  to  encourage  innovation 
in  these  areas  and  to  make  it  a  priority  to  investigate  and  approve  new  technology 
as  quickly  as  possible.  ‘‘On-screen’’  resolution  using  EDS  equipment,  for  example, 
offers  great  promise  in  enhancing  the  efficiency  of  integrated  in-line  baggage  sys-
tems,  and  the  utilization  of  technology  to  achieve  that  goal  should  be  encouraged. 
We  must  also  look  beyond  our  borders  to  learn  from  the  experiences  of  the  rest 
of  the  world.  In  many  instances,  the  goals  that  we  have  been  discussing  over  the 
course  of  the  past  several  years  both  in  terms  of  operations  and  technology  are  al-
ready  a  reality  in  many  places.  We  would  be  wise  to  study  those  successes  and  in-
corporate best practices where appropriate. 

It is our hope that the proposed move of TSA research and development programs 
to the Science and Technology Directorate will achieve synergies and avoid duplica-
tion as the Department contends. As this process moves forward, however, we must 
ensure  that  research  and  development  efforts  are  driven  by  real  needs  in  the  field 
and  that  efforts  to  centralize  the  process  do  not  lead  to  a  disconnect  between  re-
search and system needs or a dilution of effort. 
Screening Coordination and Operations Office 

The  budget  also  includes  a  sweeping  proposal  to  consolidate  several  critical  pro-
grams under the Screening Coordination and Operations Office, which is an impor-
tant and ambitious step toward a more focused approach on terrorist-related screen-
ing  programs.  As  pointed  out  by  the  9/11  Commission  Report  and  in  the  rec-
ommendations  of  Transportation  Secretary  Mineta’s  Aviation  Industry  Rapid  Re-
sponse  Team,  which  was  formed  in  the  days  immediately  after  the  2001  terrorist 
attacks,  focusing  on  the  people  who  know  and  can  do  harm  by  using  our  systems 
against us is the key to both protecting critical transportation assets and maintain-
ing the efficiency that is critical to the aviation industry and the economy. 

Verifying  and  credentialing  people  who  work  in  and  pass  through  our  transpor-
tation  system  and  borders  is  the  critical  piece  in  allowing  us  to  beat  terrorists  at 
their  own  game,  and  so  we  fully  support  the  goals  of  the  SCO.  The  key  in  moving 
forward will be to develop a common vision and to ensure that information is shared 
between  these  conceptually  similar  yet  fundamentally  different  operations.  At  the 
same time, the SCO must design a process that gives members of the traveling pub-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

10

lic  and  the  industry  confidence  that  privacy  rights  are  protected.  This  includes  a 
process  for  allowing  workers  and  travelers  falsely  identified  by  one  of  the  systems 
to  clear  their  names.  In  addition,  these  programs  must  always  be  managed  by 
industry-  and  application-specific  needs,  an  outcome  made  easier  by  consultation 
with industry and technology experts. 

The programs that are proposed to move from TSA to the newly created SCO have 
long  histories  with  the  aviation  industry  in  development,  deployment  and  daily  op-
erations.  While  gaining  consistency  through  a  coordinated  SCO  is  important,  we 
cannot allow centralization or reorganization-related distractions take programs and 
applications back to the starting line. Our experiences in the past three years have 
taught  us  that  organizational  realignments  can  stymie  progress,  so  the  challenge 
moving  forward  will  be  to  ensure  that  we  build  upon  the  work  that  has  been  con-
ducted  to  this  point  rather  than  recreate  new  systems  and  processes  from  scratch. 
The  result  will  be  better  programs,  brought  on-line  more  quickly,  at  a  lower  cost. 
Additionally,  the  Department  must  take  advantage  of  government/industry  part-
nerships  as  a  way  of  moving  programs  forward.  The  Registered  Traveler  program 
for  frequent  flyers  is  a  particular  area  of  opportunity,  and  it  is  our  hope  that  DHS 
will  build  on  existing  TSA  pilot  programs,  make  them  interoperable,  and  expand 
them to a broader, standards-based cooperative program working with industry. We 
owe it to the traveling public to quickly deploy programs that improve security and 
reduce  unnecessary  delays.  Cooperative  approaches  can  likewise  jump-start  other 
long-stove-piped  programs.  We  need  more  success  stories  of  working  together  if  we 
are  to  achieve  greater  security  and  improve  efficiency  and  convenience  for  our  citi-
zens when they work and travel. 
Focusing on TSA’s Core Mission 

Given  the  enormous  task  that  TSA  has  been  given  to  ensure  the  security  of  the 
Nation’s transportation system, the agency must rely on its airport partners to con-
tinue  performing  important  functions  that  we  have  successfully  performed  for  dec-
ades  such  as  perimeter  security  and  access  control.  Airports  are  organizations 
owned  and  operated  by  state  and  local  governments  and,  therefore,  have  the  nec-
essary and appropriate incentives to perform security responsibilities at the highest 
levels.  The  primary  mission  of  an  airport  is  to  establish  and  maintain  a  safe  and 
secure environment for travelers and the general public and to serve the community 
and  the  national  aviation  system  by  encouraging  competitive  air  service.  Airports 
have  always  been  responsible  for  the  safety  and  security  of  their  facilities  and  the 
people who use them, and this will continue to be so. 

Despite those facts, we continue to see efforts to expand TSA’s mission into areas 
traditionally  performed  by  airport  operators  and  to  expand  the  regulatory  enforce-
ment  personnel  at  airports.  This  creates  a  natural  conflict  of  interest  by  giving  a 
single entity operational and oversight responsibilities. Clearly, there are a number 
of  ways  to  better  utilize  limited  TSA  resources.  Our  members  have  been  pursuing 
every opportunity to refine and improve our working relationship with TSA to avoid 
duplication  and  to  develop  more  productive  working  relationships,  and  we  will  con-
tinue to do so. We firmly believe that these efforts will ensure that limited TSA re-
sources are reserved for other priorities. 
Additional Fees Should Be Rejected 

While  more  can  be  done  to  enhance  the  partnership  between  TSA  and  the  avia-
tion industry, that does not mean that the aviation industry and the traveling pub-
lic should shoulder the entire burden of paying for aviation security as has been pro-
posed in the President’s budget request with the addition of $1.5 billion in new pas-
senger  security  fees  toward  what  the  budget  calls  a  full  ‘‘cost-recovery’’  model  for 
aviation. If enacted, this would set the stage for security fee increases as far as the 
eye can see. This is totally unacceptable. In addition to adding to the financial woes 
of  an  already  beleaguered  industry,  the  imposition  of  new  fees  ignores  the  national 
security  implications  of  aviation  security—a  fact  that  was  evident  on  9/11—and 
breaks  faith  with  the  commitments  the  Federal  Government  made  as  part  of  the 
Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  to  assume  responsibility  for  passenger 
and  baggage  screening.  Congress  should  reject  the  President’s  proposal  and  push 
TSA toward adopting more efficient means of using technology and personnel. 
Proposed  Cuts  to  AIP  Will  Impact  Ability  of  Airports  to  Address  Security, 

Safety, Capacity 

Before  closing,  I  want  to  highlight  a  related  area  of  the  budget  where  we  cannot 
do  more  with  less  and  that  is  the  Airport  Improvement  Program,  which  the  Presi-
dent has targeted for a $600 million cut from the authorized level and a nearly $500 
million  reduction  from  last  year’s  enacted  level.  While  I  recognize  that  the  FAA 
budget is not the topic of today’s hearing, proposed cuts in AIP will have a profound 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

11

impact  on  the  ability  of  airports  to  address  ongoing  safety  and  capacity  needs.  In 
addition,  at  a  time  when  congestion  is  returning  to  our  airports  and  our  skies,  a 
reduction of airports’ authorized share of the Airport and Airway Trust Fund is ill-
advised. 

Under  AIR–21  formula  levels,  for  example,  the  minimum  entitlement  at  smaller 
commercial  service  airports  would  be  reduced  to  $650,000  from  $1  million  and  all 
primary entitlements would be halved if AIP is funded below $3.2 billion. Addition-
ally, the cargo entitlement would be reduced, the set-aside for general aviation and 
non-primary commercial service airports would be scaled back and the general avia-
tion  entitlement  of  up  to  $150,000  per  facility  would  be  eliminated.  It  also  is  cer-
tainly  worth  noting  that  the  Alaska  supplemental  entitlement  would  be  halved  as 
well. 

While these cuts would affect all airports, they would obviously have the greatest 
impact  on  smaller  facilities  that  rely  more  heavily  on  AIP  entitlements  to  support 
capital  programs.  As  members  of  this  Committee  are  well  aware,  smaller  airports 
are already struggling to deal with a number of burdensome Federal security man-
dates.  Dramatic  cuts  to  AIP  as  proposed  in  the  President’s  budget  will  exacerbate 
those problems and call into question these facilities’ long-term viability. Even if en-
titlement  cuts  are  restored,  which  is  no  guarantee,  the  overall  reduction  in  AIP 
funding will have a ripple effect throughout the aviation system. 

Taken  together,  the  President’s  budget  is  a  $2.1  billion  ‘‘one-two  punch’’  on  the 
aviation  industry.  Travelers  and  air  carriers  should  not  be  asked  to  shoulder  the 
burden  of  the  $1.5  billion  increase  in  security  fees,  and  airports  throughout  the 
country cannot sustain a $600 million reduction in AIP from authorized levels. 
Conclusion 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. We have 
highlighted  a  number  of  areas  in  which  we  believe  limited  TSA  resources  can  be 
leveraged  to  produce  enhanced  security  and  better  results  for  America’s  taxpayer 
and  the  traveling  public.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  the  TSA  to  en-
sure that our nation’s aviation system is the most secure and efficient in the world.

STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, AIR 

TRANSPORT ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr. MAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, I appreciate being here, and 
I appreciate the Committee’s indulgence in letting us come back to 
finish this abbreviated hearing, from our perspective. 

I’d  like  to  thank  you  and  the  other  members  of  this  Committee 
who really have, a clear majority, really, who have expressed their 
clear opposition to the Administration’s proposed tax increase. CBO 
has  scored  it  at  $2  billion,  if  it  were  enacted  and  passed  through, 
it would add to the $3.2 billion the carriers are already paying, and 
it would mean that at that junction, through our Aviation Security 
Fees, we would be paying some 85 percent of the overall operating 
budget of the TSA, and I think that’s wrong. You should know that 
it’s  a  tax  that  would  not  just  hit  legacy  carriers,  but  regional  and 
small carriers equally hard, and we deeply appreciate your opposi-
tion. 

Perhaps what’s most disappointing is that this tax is contrary to 
a  well-established  public  policy  that  aviation  security  is  a  critical 
component  of  maintaining  national  security  of  our  country.  Your 
Co-Chairman, Senator Inouye, authored an article that appeared in 
The Hill newspaper not long ago, and I’d like to quote from it, ‘‘We 
all  recognize  that  after  September  11  transportation  security  is  a 
matter of national security. It had to become national security. The 
vote  in  Congress  to  make  this  fundamental  change  was  100–0  in 
the  Senate,  410–9  in  the  House.’’  Co-Chairman  Inouye  went  on  in 
the article to say, ‘‘After reviewing the Administration’s budget re-
quest  for  the  DHS  and  TSA,  it  becomes  clear  that  the  airline  fee 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

12

proposal  is  but  one  example  of  the  Administration’s  failure  to 
equate transportation security with national security.’’

Mr. Chairman, in fact, all Americans benefit from a secure avia-
tion  system,  whether  or  not  they  happen  to  be  on  an  airplane  at 
a given time or shipping goods. In addition, the U.S. economy bene-
fits  broadly  from  a  safe  and  vigorous  air  transportation  system, 
and for these reasons, the ATA and its members vigorously oppose 
this tax. 

It’s  probably  equally  disturbing  that  TSA,  in  proposing  this  tax, 
has also failed to demonstrate a need for it in the face of well-docu-
mented  and  continuing  weak  financial  management.  Neither  the 
security  nor  the  business  case  for  this  tax  increase  was  ever  made 
to this Committee or anywhere else. 

Consequently,  the  net  effect  is  that  airlines  would  be  confronted 
with  the  worst  of  two  worlds,  an  additional  $2  billion  tax  on  top 
of the $3.2 billion I mentioned a moment ago, with no apparent in-
crease  or  enhancement  to  aviation  security.  It’s  equally  trouble-
some  that  TSA  wants  to  raise  taxes  without  improved  managerial 
oversight of its activities. As the GAO pointed out in a very recent 
report,  managerial  improvement  is  indispensable  if  important  pro-
grams  that  will  benefit  the  public  are  to  move  from  the  drawing 
board  to  reality.  We’ve  all  read  the  stories,  I  don’t  need  to  repeat 
them here today. 

At  the  same  time,  continuing  problems  with  the  no-fly  list  and 
selectee  list  make  headlines  on  a  regular  basis,  and  the  effort  to 
put  into  place  a  system  to  augment  CAPPS  I  is  beginning  to  look 
a  little  bit  like  the  search  for  the  Holy  Grail.  First  it  was  CAPPS 
II,  then  it  was  reborn  as  Secure  Flight.  And  after  some  two  years 
of effort, numerous missteps and an unknown amount of employee 
time  and  money,  TSA  has  still  not  moved  past  the  testing  phase. 
So, you’ve got CAPPS I, CAPPS II, Secure Flight. Now, in addition, 
we’re in the testing phase of a Registered Traveler program. There 
are five different programs set up at five different airport locations 
with  five  different  airlines,  none  of  which  talk  to  one  another,  or 
conveniently  communicate  in  a  central  system.  And  let’s  not  over-
look  the  lack  of  coordination  with  an  effort  to  test  on  an  inter-
national  arrival  passenger  system,  initiated  not  by  TSA,  but  by 
Customs and Border Protection. And then there’s the APIS, the Ad-
vanced  Passenger  Information  System  for  passengers  on  inbound 
international flights. 

In  short,  DHS  is  undertaking  a  wide  variety  of  very  important 
efforts  that  are  simply  not  coordinated.  And  what’s  the  solution? 
Two  suggestions.  First,  to  spend  more  wisely  DHS  needs  the  right 
plan and a strong management focus on coordination. Tell us what 
information  you  need,  keep  it  within  a  central  collection  point, 
make  it  consistent,  whether  it’s  the  State  Department,  or  the  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security,  or  TSA,  or  Customs  and  Border 
Protection,  so  that  we  have  a  system  that  allows  us  to  attack  peo-
ple, not things, which I think most of our security experts think is 
an important goal. 

I  think  it’s  also  time  for  TSA,  DHS  and  the  Committee  to  take 
a  step  back  to  develop  an  analytical,  risk-based  approach  to  guide 
how it spends its limited resources. This view was echoed by a task 
force  on  homeland  defense  chaired  by  The  Heritage  Foundation, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

13

and CSIS. A key recommendation from that report is to rationalize 
government  spending  by  establishing  a  risk-based  mechanism  for 
DHS-wide resource allocation and grant making. The 9/11 Commis-
sion  made  a  nearly  identical  recommendation  on  making  hard 
choices, we agree. 

In  conclusion,  three  suggestions,  three  principles  that  the  Com-
mittee  and  DHS  and  TSA  need  to  keep  in  mind.  One,  establish 
once and forever that aviation security is a function of national se-
curity,  and  should  be  paid  for  accordingly.  Two,  make  the  hard 
choices  using  risk-based  mechanisms  in  order  to  allocate  resources 
more  wisely,  and  three,  manage  the  homeland  defense  structure 
more  effectively  to  realize  the  efficiencies  anticipated  by  Congress 
when they created TSA. 

Thank  you,  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  your  strong  support  of  our 
issue,  and  the  leadership  that  you  provide,  along  with  Senator 
Inouye for this Committee. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. May follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES C. MAY, PRESIDENT/CEO, AIR TRANSPORT 

ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA, INC. 

Mr.  Chairman,  at  the  outset  I  want  to  thank  you  and  the  Members  of  this  Com-
mittee—a clear majority—who have expressed opposition to the Administration’s in-
crease of the September 11th Passenger Security Fee. This proposal has been scored 
by  the  CBO  at  $2  billion.  Let  me  be  clear,  all  carriers—low-cost,  network  and  re-
gional—will  be  harmed  if  this  tax  increase  is  approved.  We  appreciate  your  opposi-
tion. 

Perhaps what is most disappointing is that this tax is contrary to well established 
public  policy  that  aviation  security  is  a  critical  component  of  maintaining  the  na-
tional security of our country. A recent article penned by Co-Chairman Inouye pub-
lished  in  The  Hill  brings  home  this  point  more  than  once.  In  his  article,  Senator 
Inouye observed:

‘‘We all recognized after Sept. 11 that transportation security is a matter of na-
tional  security . . . It  had  to  become  a  national-security  function.  The  vote  in 
Congress  to  make  this  fundamental  change  was  100–0  in  the  Senate  and  410–
9 in the House.’’ Co-Chairman Inouye goes on to note that ‘‘After reviewing the 
administration’s budget request for the DHS and TSA, it becomes clear that the 
airline-fee proposal is but one example of the administration’s failure to equate 
transportation security with national security.’’

In fact, all Americans benefit from a secure aviation system, whether or not they 
fly  or  ship  goods.  In  addition,  the  U.S.  economy  benefits  broadly  from  a  safe  and 
vigorous  air  transportation  system.  For  these  reasons,  the  cost  of  aviation  security 
should be borne just as broadly. 
No Justification 

Equally  disturbing  is  TSA’s  failure  to  demonstrate  the  need  for  this  tax  increase 
in the face of well-documented and continuing weak financial management. Neither 
the security nor the business case for the tax increase has been made. 

Consequently, airlines will be confronted with the worst of two worlds—a national 
security  tax  increase  added  to  an  already  crushing  $3.2  billion  tax  which  holds  no 
promise to enhance aviation security. 

Also  troublesome  is  that  TSA  wants  to  raise  taxes  without  improved  managerial 
oversight of its activities. As the GAO has pointed out in recent reports, managerial 
improvement is indispensable if important programs that will benefit the public are 
to move from the drawing board to reality. We have all read the stories—I need not 
repeat them here. 

At the same time, continuing problems with the no-fly and selectee lists make the 
headlines  on  a  regular  basis,  and  the  effort  to  put  into  place  a  system  to  augment 
CAPPS I is beginning to look like the search for the Holy Grail. First it was CAPPS 
II, and then it was reborn as Secure Flight. But after some two years of effort, nu-
merous  missteps  and  an  unknown  amount  of  employee  time  and  money,  TSA  has 
not  moved  past  the  testing  phase.  In  addition,  the  testing  phase  of  the  Registered 
Traveler program has made little sense, with five different systems unable to inter-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

14

face  or  lay  the  groundwork  for  a  national  system.  Also  not  to  be  overlooked  is  the 
lack  of  coordination  with  the  effort  to  test  an  international  arrival  passenger  infor-
mation  system  initiated  by  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  and  the  Advance  Pas-
senger Information System for passengers on inbound international flights. In short, 
DHS  is  undertaking  a  wide  variety  of  important  efforts  that  are  simply  not  coordi-
nated. What is the solution? Let me make two suggestions. 

First,  to  spend  more  wisely  DHS  needs  the  right  plan  and  a  strong  management 
focus on coordination, and must establish an overall plan that identifies how the op-
erations  of  each  entity  fit  together  without  duplication  and  work  on  the  basis  of 
agreed upon data that can be collected by a single entity. 

Second,  and  most  importantly  the  time  has  also  come  for  TSA,  supported  by  this 
Committee,  to  take  a  step  back  and  develop  an  analytical,  risk-based  approach  to 
guide  how  it  spends  its  limited  resources.  This  view  was  echoed  by  a  task  force  on 
homeland defense chaired by The Heritage Foundation and The Center for Strategic 
and  International  Studies.  The  key  recommendation  from  that  report  is  to  ration-
alize  government  spending  by  establishing  a  risk-based  mechanism  for  DHS-wide 
resource allocation and grant making. The 9/11 Commission made a nearly identical 
recommendation on making hard choices in allocating precious resources. We agree. 
Conclusion 

In  the  post-9/11  world,  the  number  of  projects  which  no  doubt  would  improve  se-
curity  by  some  degree  is  virtually  unlimited.  The  challenge  is  to  determine  where 
to  draw  the  line.  In  our  view,  three  principles  must  guide  the  Congress  and  TSA: 
(1) establish once and forever that aviation security is a function of national security 
and should be paid for accordingly, and (2) make the hard choices using a risk-based 
mechanism in order to allocate resources more wisely, and (3) manage the homeland 
defense structure more effectively to realize the efficiencies anticipated by Congress 
when it created DHS.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thanks  very  much  to  the  two  of  you  for  return-
ing. I know that it was a difficult time in the first hearing, and you 
sat with us patiently, so we appreciate you taking the time to come 
back and complete the hearing. 

Mr. Barclay, have your people worked on the Registered Traveler 
and  Transportation  Worker  Identification  Credential  programs? 
Are you working with TSA on that? 

Mr. BARCLAY. We are, Mr. Chairman, and together with Jim and 
his folks and most of the people in the industry couldn’t agree more 
with  the  necessity  to  get  a  program  like  that  going,  in  order  to 
know  more  about  people  willing  to  volunteer  information  on  them-
selves. It helps us do a much better job of spreading resources. 

If I could just pass on, too, we have a number of important part-
nerships  with  TSA,  one  of  which  is  on  the  background  checks  of 
airport workers, both airport and airline workers. One of the things 
that’s  happened  since  9/11  is  that  good  news  has  not  been  news, 
and  we’ve  worked  together  with  TSA  to  do  background  checks  on 
1.6  million  workers.  Pre-9/11  that  process  used  to  take  52  days  to 
do the check on a worker, now it takes 4 hours to do it. And that’s 
a  success  story,  that’s  saved  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  to  the 
industry.  It’s  a  success  story  that  we’ve  worked  together  with  TSA 
on,  and  we  think  there  are  more  partnerships  like  that  with  Jim’s 
organization  and  with  ours,  and  with  TSA  on  programs  like  Reg-
istered Traveler that can greatly benefit the system. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You’re  familiar  with  the  GAO  report  concerning 
the  adequacy  of  the  security  of  airport  perimeters  and  the  various 
access controls, you’re familiar with that, aren’t you? 

Mr. BARCLAY. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Have airports and TSA done enough to meet the 

comments of GAO, to respond to that report? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

15

Mr.  BARCLAY.  Airports,  again,  have  local  law  enforcement  there 
at each airport, and if we can get some consistent rules on how we 
want  those  local  police  departments  to  operate,  you’ll  find  very, 
very  good  compliance  out  there  among  local  governments.  So,  we 
are working with TSA to respond to the specifics on that. On access 
control,  we’re  way  ahead  of  all  other  industries,  because  virtually 
every  major  airport  already  has  a  highly  developed  access  control 
system  to  and  from  the  secure  areas  of  airports.  We  need  to  add 
biometrics to that, but we have to get standards out of the govern-
ment  before  we  can  add  those  biometrics  so  we  don’t  have  to  do  it 
twice, and there is more we can do, but airports are determined to 
do that in the future. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Are  you  satisfied  there  is  a  sufficient  worker 

identification credential program? Is the one in place right now? 

Mr. BARCLAY. Well, there is at each airport, and we’re doing the 
criminal  history  record  checks,  as  I  say,  with  the  Federal  Govern-
ment. I do think there’s more that needs to be done there, we—for 
example,  when  you  run  checks,  even  after  you  run  people  through 
the  FBI  process  with  a  criminal  history  record  check,  you’ll  still 
find  about  5  percent  of  people  whose  names  won’t  match  their  So-
cial  Security  number  and  their  address.  Now,  folks  that  are  not 
telling you the truth about who they are, that’s a risk group I want 
to take a very, very close look at, as opposed to somebody who sim-
ply has been guilty of a crime when they were in college. We need 
to,  and  airports  want  to  do  more  on  these  checks,  particularly  of 
our  workers,  but  many  of  those  same  concepts  apply  to  security  in 
the system in general. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  we  need  to  go  further  to  mandate  TSA  to 
work  with  your  industry  on  these  issues:  access,  worker  security, 
and basic transportation security? 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  We  have  proposals  on  that,  Mr.  Chairman,  we’d 
like  to  share  with  the  Committee  that  we  do  think  that  would  be 
helpful.  It  would  be  helpful  for  TSA  and  DHS.  It  would  be  helpful 
for  us,  and  they  build  on  the  example  of  successful  partnerships  I 
was mentioning earlier. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, there seems to be some disconnect, so we’d 
like  to  have  those.  I’m  sure  the  rest  of  the  Committee  would  like 
to have a chance to look at those. With regard to the airlines them-
selves, we have some problems about passenger fees. I think that’s 
the subject here, but why does the industry take the position that, 
with the current economy, that these fees would really be a greater 
detriment to travel? Isn’t that your position? 

Mr. MAY. Well, sir, I think our position is that one, aviation secu-
rity is national security and ought to be paid for accordingly. Two, 
we  are  already  contributing  $3.2  billion  annually  to  the  TSA.  On 
top  of  that,  we  have  about  another  $2  billion  in  out  of  pocket  ex-
penses, that according to the enabling legislation were to have been 
reimbursed, that have never been reimbursed. Issues like cargo se-
curity, catering, screening and a whole range of other activities. So, 
we  don’t  feel  like  we’re  not  paying  our  fair  share,  since  we’re  the 
only  people  paying  into  DHS  or  TSA  of  any  industry.  And  I  think 
that  needs  to  change.  And  the  idea  that  you’re  going  to  levy  an-
other $2 billion on an industry that just finished losing $10 billion 
last  year,  $33  billion  over  the  last  3  years,  and  expect  us  to  pass 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

16

it  through  to  the  passenger  in  an  environment  where  we  literally 
don’t  have  any  pricing  power,  is  just  wholly  unrealistic.  It’s  going 
to come directly from the bottom line. 

Our  carriers  have  done  a  terrific  job  of  managing  the  costs  they 
can  manage.  The  ones  they  can’t  are  the  taxes,  the  fees,  and  the 
price of oil. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Last  question,  as  I  understand  it,  this  fee,  if  we 
approved  it,  would  not  increase  the  amount  of  money  available  to 
TSA,  it  would  just  replace  some  of  the  current  sources  of  funds. 
Now,  what  if  we  said,  OK,  we’ll  approve  the  fee,  but  it  all  has  to 
go to TSA, do you think it’s needed? 

Mr.  MAY.  I  think  that  TSA  would  have  to  prove  that  they’ve  got 
a  real  use  for  that  money  that’s  going  to  substantially  improve 
aviation  security,  number  one,  and  they’re  going  to  have  to  dem-
onstrate  that  they’ve  got  a  functioning  management  team  that 
knows what they’re doing, number two, and I don’t think those two 
hurdles can be achieved. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Inouye? 
Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  May,  if  I  may  follow  up  on  my  Chairman’s 
questioning,  isn’t  it  true  that  at  this  moment,  most  of  the  legacy 
airlines have fiscal problems? 

Mr.  MAY.  Sir,  we’ve  got  a  number  of  carriers  in  Chapter  11,  as 
I indicated a moment ago. We lost $10 billion last year as an indus-
try. We’ve got $33 billion in losses over the past 3 years, and we’re 
projecting  if  oil  stays  where  it  is  today  or  near  it,  that  we’ll  lose 
another $5 billion this year. 

Now,  the  good  news  is  that  confluence  of  tough  economic  news 
has  given  carriers  the  opportunity  to  make  changes  to  their  oper-
ations,  the  likes  of  which  they’ve  never  made.  We’ve  re-negotiated 
our  labor  contracts,  we’ve  achieved  fuel  efficiency,  we’ve  changed 
our  routing  systems,  we’ve  gotten  all  sorts  of  productivity  gains  in 
place, we’ve eliminated, unfortunately, 130,000 employees just from 
the  airlines  business,  we’ve  cut  capital  spending  by  billions  of  dol-
lars  annually.  But  there  are  some  things  that  we  can’t  control. 
Taxes and fees imposed by the Federal Government amount to $15 
billion  annually  on  this  industry,  which  only  generates  about  $80 
billion  in  revenue  a  year.  So,  that’s  a  huge  percentage  of  our 
annualized  revenue.  And  on  top  of  that,  we’ve  got  oil  prices  that 
are  probably  $20  higher  than  any  expert  would  have  predicted  a 
year and a half ago. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Can  the  passenger  transportation  security  fee 

be easily passed on? 

Mr. MAY. Not a prayer, Senator, not a prayer. It will come right 

from the carrier, bottom line. 

Senator INOUYE. And from what you’ve described as to the fiscal 

position, to absorb that would be disaster. 

Mr.  MAY.  It  would  be  absolutely  disastrous  and  it  would  be  an 
impact,  not  just  on  the  so-called  ‘‘legacy’’  carriers,  but  on  regional 
airlines, on small carriers, independents, the so-called low cost car-
riers. 

Senator INOUYE. You’ve also indicated that you’ve had to re-nego-
tiate your contract with labor, and I know that some of the airlines 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

17

have  had  three  pay  cuts,  and  one,  I  think,  had  four  pay  cuts.  Do 
you expect labor to keep on cutting? 

Mr.  MAY.  Sir,  I  think  anybody  that  knows  anything  about  this 
business  has  to  feel  the  pain  of  the  employees  that  work  for  our 
carriers. They have been major participants in the process of trying 
to  keep  us  in  business,  but  at  some  point,  others  that  sit  on  your 
side  of  the  desk  have  to  understand—and  I  think  you  clearly  have 
demonstrated  that,  along  with  your  colleagues  here  today—that 
proposals  like  this  coming  out  of  government  are  going  to  have  a 
direct impact on the individual employees of these carriers. 

We’ve  laid  off,  as  I  said  a  minute  ago,  130,000  of  those  employ-
ees, $2 billion more in revenue out of the bottom line for these car-
riers  is  going  to  mean  untold  more  employees  are  going  to  have  to 
get  laid  off  because  we  don’t  have  the  pricing  power  to  put  those 
charges through. 

Senator  INOUYE.  If  this  fee  becomes  law,  that  would  mean  that 
you  would  be  absorbing  about  85  plus  percent  of  the  costs  of  secu-
rity? 

Mr. MAY. Senator Inouye, that is exactly right. We would, if this 
went  through,  account  for—in  direct  funds  paid—for  about  85  per-
cent of TSA’s budget. 

Senator INOUYE. We have no idea as to what the other countries 

have done, but is this typical of what you find, say, in Europe? 

Mr. MAY. No, sir, it is not. It’s not typical of Asia——
Senator INOUYE. How do the French handle this? 
Mr.  MAY.  I  can  not  tell  you  specifically  how  the  French  handle 
it, but I know that there are very different regimes across the EC. 
Senator  INOUYE.  They’re  much  more  helpful  in  the  sense  that 

they consider this a national security item? 

Mr. MAY. I think that is the case, sir, and I think overall, people 
in other parts of the world do not have the intense level of security 
that  we  see  here  in  the  United  States.  I  think  there’s  a  different 
metric  that  gets  used,  they  tend  to  worry  more  about  people  than 
they  worry  about  things.  You’re  an  international  traveler  who 
spends  a  good  bit  of  time  in  different  parts  of  the  world,  and  I 
know that as you go through security in other major airports, you’ll 
see it’s a very different environment than that which you find here 
in the United States. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Barclay,  it’s  been  suggested  by  many  that 
we’re  not  looking  into  appropriate  technology,  we  rely  too  much 
upon human power, is there any credence to that? 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  There  is  on  the  screening  we’re  doing  of  baggage. 
As  we  were  saying,  there  is  actually  technology  out  there  right 
now,  and  if  we  build  it  in,  we  get  enormous  savings  in  personnel 
costs  at  TSA  that  can  more  than  pay  for  the  building  in  of  that 
equipment. It speeds up the process, and not only does a better job 
of  checking  the  bags,  but  it  makes  the  experience  much  more  con-
venient, and it saves personnel for the Federal Government, so, it’s 
hard to come up with an argument against doing it, except that in 
a  one-year  appropriation  process,  you  don’t  have  enough  money  to 
do the capital costs in order to earn the return on the savings you 
get, and that’s a formula we’ve been arguing we should figure out. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair-

man. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Ensign? 

18

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN ENSIGN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEVADA 

Senator ENSIGN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  would  like  to  start  by  addressing  the  Registered  Traveler  pro-
gram,  from  both  of  your  perspectives.  It’s  something  you  both  talk 
about  supporting.  The  concept  of  it  sounds  good,  that  you  move 
people  through  more  quickly.  How  do  you  see  it  working?  Right 
now  I  look  at  the  employees  at  the  airport,  who  are  supposedly 
trusted  travelers,  but  yet  they  go  through  this  same  security  line 
the  same  way  that  everybody  else  does.  They  may  have  separate 
security lines, but it’s still a security line. Is that what is foreseen? 
Are these lines just special because there are fewer registered peo-
ple, so they’ll have shorter lines? Kind of like a first class line? Or, 
do they actually go through less of a screening process? How do you 
foresee it working? Either one of you can start. 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  You’re  dead  on,  Senator,  that  with  the  Registered 
Traveler  program,  the  thing  to  keep  in  mind  is  that  we  let  hun-
dreds  of  people  every  day  on  airplanes  with  guns,  because  we’ve 
done background checks on them, and we know they’re not a threat 
to the system. The issue is not spending more of our resources look-
ing  for  dangerous  people  rather  than  dangerous  things.  A  trusted 
person  with  dangerous  things  on  them  is  not  a  threat  to  the  sys-
tem,  and  an  untrustworthy  person  with  nothing  on  them  is  a 
threat  to  the  system,  and  the  lesson  of  9/11  was  that  the  powerful 
weapon there was knowledge. It was the hijackers’ knowledge that 
the  policy  of  that  day  was  to  do  whatever  it  took  to  get  the  plane 
on the ground, be passive in the face of a hijacking, and they used 
that policy against us, and that frankly was a good policy, because 
it had saved thousands of lives in the decades prior to 9/11. 

So,  you  had  people  that,  it  wasn’t  the  box  cutters,  as  the  fourth 
airplane  showed,  it  was  that  knowledge  that  was  used  against  us 
of  our  own  system.  So,  it’s  those  dangerous  people  we  need  to  be 
looking  hard  for.  The  relationship  to  Registered  Traveler  is,  if  we 
can  get  people  to  volunteer  lots  of  information  on  themselves,  and 
we  can  be  confident  through  biometrics  that  those  people  are  not 
dangers  to  the  system,  having  them  take  laptops  out  of  their  bags 
and take their shoes off when we’re using background checks to let 
people  on  the  planes  with  guns  doesn’t  make  any  sense.  We  need 
to  start  a  Registered  Traveler  program  so  we  can  explain  some  of 
these  things  more  clearly  to  the  public,  I  think,  and  get  the  public 
to  understand  that  if  you  are  volunteering  information  on  yourself 
and  you  are  part  of  a  Registered  Traveler  program,  you’re  really 
doing a lot for everybody’s security. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  From  what  you’ve  seen  at  the  airports  where 

TSA is trying this, is that what they’re doing? 

Mr. MAY. No. 
Senator ENSIGN. That was the point that I was making. From my 
conversations with TSA—all they seem to be doing is gathering in-
formation  in  order  to  lessen  the  lines.  The  reason  you  can  get 
somebody  to  sign  up  for  a  Registered  Traveler  program  is  so  they 
can speed through a line faster, but if they’re going through exactly 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

19

the  same  thing  they  went  through  before,  how  does  that  get  them 
through the lines? 

Mr.  MAY.  Sir,  we’ve  said  the  same  thing,  if  you  don’t  provide  an 
incentive  then  you’re  not  going  to  have  people  volunteer  the  infor-
mation.  The  systems,  we’ve  got  five  in  place  today,  they  don’t  talk 
to one another, there were five different carriers, five different air-
ports, and the sixth one is about to start. 

Senator ENSIGN. Let’s take that a little bit further, regarding the 
whole way that TSA operates. TSA, it would seem to me, has iden-
tified  risk  from  security  checkpoints  to  the  airport.  OK,  but  they 
don’t identify any of the lines they create in back of those security 
checkpoints.  As  you  just  talked  about,  the  terrorists  take  advan-
tage of their knowledge of where the weaknesses in the system are. 
Well,  the  weakness  in  the  system  now  is  the  lines.  If  you  walk  in 
with  a  suitcase  bomb,  you’re  going  to  kill  a  lot  of  people.  When 
you’ve got a couple of thousand people in line, like at Dulles airport 
or  any  of  the  other  major  airports  during  peak  times,  the  CAPP 
system and all of these other various things that they’re doing keep 
adding on. Like you have talked about, trying to go after that min-
iscule  little  cigarette  lighter,  or  whatever  it  is  that  they’re  going 
after, slows the lines down, backs them up, and creates another op-
portunity for terrorists. It would seem to me that we need to start 
looking at a risk-based system. You’re never going to get rid of ev-
erything,  so  how  can  you  minimize  the  overall  risk  to  the  greatest 
degree  for  the  amount  of  funding  that  you  have  to  work  with,  be-
cause you can’t have unlimited screeners and unlimited lines if you 
want  to  get  people  through  quickly.  Given  what  we  have,  it  would 
seem to me that, using various computerized models where nobody 
could  predict  it,  you  let  certain  people  through  to  keep  the  lines 
down at certain times. It seems to me that we need more feedback 
from  the  people  on  the  ground,  like  yourselves,  to  put  pressure  on 
lawmakers, because lawmakers aren’t thinking this way now. TSA 
is  a  bureaucracy.  They’re  not  going  to  take  chances.  They’re  not 
going to take a risk by themselves. As lawmakers, we have to make 
those choices. We have to tell TSA that we’re the ones who created 
the  monster  in  the  first  place,  and  we  have  to  be  the  ones  to  fix 
it.  But,  we  can  only  do  that  with  your  help,  giving  us  the  input 
that we need. 

Mr. MAY. Senator, I couldn’t agree more, it’s one of the principal 
three tenets I closed my remarks with, it’s what the 9/11 Commis-
sion said, it’s what Heritage has said, it’s what CSIS has said. Ev-
erybody  who’s  looked  at  it  says  you  have  to  have  a  risk-based  as-
sessment. We can have perfect security for airlines, nobody will fly, 
and that’s the risk. 

I would suggest that there are probably some folks in your home-
town  that  are  pretty  good  at  security,  that  are  also  very  good  at 
moving  people  and  customer  service  that  we  could  take  some  les-
sons from at TSA. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  All  right,  I  appreciate  that.  Mr.  Chairman, 
thank  you.  I  know  that  for  my  state,  and  states  like  Hawaii  that 
depend so much on tourism, it seems like every time that we start 
getting  a  handle  on  moving  lines  through,  TSA  comes  out  with  a 
new  rulemaking  process.  As  we’ve  seen  with  all  of  the  reports, 
they’re  not  doing  any  better  of  a  job,  but  they  keep  adding  new 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

20

rules which make the lines back up again for a while. Until we get 
more  resources,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  really  need—as  a  Congress—to 
take  a  hard  look  at  what  we’re  doing  with  the  money  that  we’re 
spending. In the long run, we’re just costing more and more in fees, 
we’re costing the economy more, and we’re making it a pain in the 
rear  end  to  travel  for  anyone  who  does  it  on  any  kind  of  a  regular 
basis. And I thank you. 

Mr.  MAY.  If  I  might,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  scary  part  is  that  we’ve 
got  advanced  bookings  for  the  summer  that  are  record  bookings. 
We’re going to have a lot of people at airports, a lot of people trav-
eling on planes, and we’re delighted for that good news, but it also 
means that if something doesn’t happen soon to expedite that load 
of  passengers  through  these  airports  headed  to  Hawaii  and  Las 
Vegas  and  New  York  and  other  places,  then  we’re  going  to  have  a 
summer that both we and you hear from both of our collective con-
stituents  and  customers  as  to  why  they’ve  missed  a  flight  because 
they couldn’t get through security on time. 

The CHAIRMAN. Add Alaska next time. 
Mr. MAY. Yes, sir. Well, that’s where I’m going, personally. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Pryor?  Oh,  pardon  me,  Mr.  Lautenberg. 

Sorry about that, Senator Lautenberg. 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  When  age  takes  over,  and  all  three  of  us 
have the same exact vintage problem, so—all three veterans of the 
Big War, two heroes and me. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. My professors once told me I wouldn’t make any 

money until my hair got grey, they were right. You did. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I’m  afraid  to  step  out  here,  because  he  is 
still  the  Chairman,  and  probably  going  to  be  around  for  the  next 
20 years while I’m running. 

To  get  to  a  very  serious  subject  and  concern  that  we  all  share—
the solutions are where we get to the problems. And when we hear, 
Mr.  May,  about  the  losses  that  the  airlines  have  in  front  of  them, 
a  question  for  me  is—is  it  primarily  the  costs  for  security?  How 
about  the  costs  for  fuel?  How  about  the  fact  that  new  airlines  can 
come in with a lot less capital burden than the ‘‘legacy’’ airlines as 
we  call  them—isn’t  that  where  a  lot  of  the  problem  is  created,  is 
that it’s very hard for the well-established airlines, the names that 
we all know, to compete with the so-called upstarts, the newer air-
lines? 

Mr. MAY. Senator, your observations are very much on target, as 
always. I mentioned fuel in my testimony as one of the critical ele-
ments. There are really two—we’ve taken on all of those costs over 
which  we  have  some  degree  of  control,  if  you  will—there  are  two 
areas  where  we  have  little  or  no  control.  One  is  the  price  of  oil, 
which  we  had  hoped  would  be  in  the  high  thirties,  maybe  low  for-
ties and is now, clearly as we all know, in the low fifties, and that’s 
having  just  a  devastating  impact  on  the  business.  It  is  the  dif-
ference between break-even and having lost a lot of money for most 
of  our  carriers.  Add  to  that  an  unconscionable  tax  burden  that,  as 
I  said,  we’re  paying  as  an  industry,  and  we  don’t  have  the  luxury 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

21

of  paying  income  taxes  in  this  mix,  we’re  paying  literally  $15  bil-
lion a year on $80 billion in revenue. There’s something wrong with 
that equation. That’s a higher tax load than alcoholic beverages, to-
bacco,  a  variety  of  other  sin  products  where  the  tax  load  is  in-
tended  to  discourage  consumption.  So,  I  think  we  need  to  address 
those  areas  where  we  have  control.  As  to  the  other  operational 
parts  of  the  business,  there  are  no  effective  barriers  to  entry,  the 
market  is  awash  in  money.  We’ve  got  some  16  to  18  applications 
at the FAA, as you and I are sitting here today, of people wanting 
to  come  into  the  business,  as  bad  as  it  is.  They’ve  got  a  plan  that 
they  figure  they’re  going  to  make  some  money,  so  you’ve  got  pres-
sure on the FAA to issue new 121 certificates, and we’ve got a level 
of  competition  in  the  business  that  creates  overcapacity  on  seats 
that is such that it is having a dramatic impact on pricing. 

Senator  ENSIGN.  But  with  your  expectations  for  the  summer,  as 
robust as they are, it would sound like there won’t be enough seats 
at  the  rate  that  we’re  going.  It’s  really  a  long-term  question  about 
whether  or  not  in  the  days  of  regulation  things  operated  a  little 
better, there were fewer problems in terms of scheduling, et cetera. 
Now we’ve reduced the separation. We know more people are flying 
and  that  delays  are  not  uncommon.  I  get  delayed  a  lot  when  I  fly 
out  of  Washington  National.  When  I  go  north  to  Newark  or  New 
York,  we’ve  got  to  wait  until  they  clear  the  decks  up  there,  reduce 
the  traffic  volume.  I  chide  the  pilots  often  and  say,  ‘‘You’ve  got  to 
get  faster  airplanes  here.’’  The  fact  of  the  matter  is,  you  sit  and 
wait  an  hour  and  a  quarter  to  take  off—as  I  did  the  other  day—
for a 36-minute flight, as it’s advertised. We just can’t seem to keep 
up  with  it.  There’s  finite  space  in  the  sky  and  you  just  can’t  keep 
throwing  more  airplanes  up  there.  In  particular,  Mr.  Chairman,  if 
one of the goals currently is to get rid of Amtrak, which carries 25 
million passengers a year, that would raise problems that could not 
be  dealt  with  except  by  some  kind  of  re-regulation,  and  we  don’t 
want to go into that. 

Mr. MAY. Senator Lautenberg, I just spent 2 days at a conference 
sponsored  by  the  FAA  dealing  with  the  whole  business  of  funding 
for  the  Aviation  Trust  Fund  and  that  expires  in  2007—September 
of  2007.  I  think  one  of  the  classic  opportunities,  as  well  as  chal-
lenges,  that  this  Committee  is  going  to  face,  is  what  to  do  about 
the national air space, how do we collapse a system that was built 
in  the  1950s  and  the  1960s  that  is  terribly  antiquated  that  can’t 
handle the capacity that we’ve got coming online. Put with it a rea-
sonable,  realistic  funding  mechanism,  add  in  bonding  authority 
where it’s appropriate to do that, and that would become one of the 
great  challenges  of  our  time,  to  make  the  changes  that  are  nec-
essary in that system. And I think that if we don’t do it, that hour 
and  30-minute  wait,  or  15-minute  wait  is  going  to  be  2  hours  and 
15 minutes, because we have more planes in the system today than 
it  can  handle.  The  explosion  of  planes  coming  out  of  Teterboro, 
coming  into  the  mess,  and  we’ve  got  to  find  a  way  to  handle  that, 
and it means new technology, getting rid of the old, duplicative, an-
tiquated  systems  that  we’ve  got,  finding  new  funding  alternatives 
and making the changes that are going to be very difficult to make 
politically, because there are constituent jobs at stake and so forth. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

22

But  I  think  it  is  going  to  be  one  of  the  great  challenges  this  Com-
mittee faces. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Barclay,  could  the  airports  pick  up 
some  of  this  increased  cost  that  is  being  proposed?  I  sit  here  and 
I  speak,  not  for  my  colleagues,  but  I  haven’t  heard  anybody  speak 
up  on  behalf  of  adding  this  tax  for  security,  purportedly.  Can  the 
airports  come  up  with  a  way  to  fund  it  out  of  their  revenue  some-
how? 

Mr. BARCLAY. I know that with your experience as a Board Mem-
ber of the Port Authority, you know that airports really don’t make 
money. If new costs come on, they figure out who to charge to pass 
that cost along, but you still wind up with the major airports back 
at  the  airlines  and  they’d  have  to  then  figure  out,  could  they  pass 
it along to the passengers. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Having been a Board Member of the Com-
mission of the Port Authority before I got here, it’s always been my 
view that the best place to handle security would be at the airports 
themselves,  by  the  airport  management,  people  that  are  experi-
enced with all of the movements that take place in that airport, in-
stead  of  having  to  create  an  organization  outside,  amorphous,  and 
I  really  think  that  TSA  is  trying  its  best.  We’ve  got  a  new  Sec-
retary, and I talk to him fairly frequently. He comes from New Jer-
sey,  that  doesn’t  mean  that  he  caters  to  New  Jersey,  but  the  fact 
of  the  matter  is,  he’s  trying  to  get  the  job  done  and  we  wish  him 
well,  and  we  just  can’t  add  costs  without  realizing  that  we  will 
never, ever, ever, capture everyone who has malice intended for us, 
whether it’s through their shoes or through some other system. Ex-
cept,  I  now  feel  better,  Mr.  Chairman,  flying  better,  the  cockpit 
doors  are  fortified,  for  the  most  part,  and  I’ll  never  understand 
why,  simply—and  I’ve  mentioned  this  before—that  we  don’t  have 
a TV camera in the cabin and a monitor in the cockpit for at least 
the pilot or the flying crew to understand if something is wrong in 
the back. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman, I appreciate it. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Senator. I don’t know why 
we don’t get some money out of people who have businesses in rail-
road terminals, or money from the people who ride railroads to pro-
vide their own security. But this is for another day, right? 

Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Barclay,  I’d  like  to  talk  to  you  about  in-line 
explosive  detection  systems,  and  I  think  the  installation  of  in-line 
EDS  systems  at  our  airports  is  the  single  most  important  thing 
that  we  can  do  to  increase  efficiency  in  the  baggage  screening, 
while  also  improving  safety  and  security  at  our  airports.  Do  you 
agree with that? 

Mr. BARCLAY. Absolutely. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK,  now  let  me  ask  this,  if  we  had  to  make  the 
initial  investment  in  in-line  EDS  systems,  or  we  make  the  invest-
ment now for in-line EDS systems now and we were to achieve all 
of  the  savings  and  efficiencies  that  we’ve  seen  at  some  of  the  par-
ticipating airports, would it be necessary to continue increasing air-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

23

line  security  fees?  And  let  me  give  you  a  little  background  on  that 
so  you  understand  the  context  of  my  question.  It  just  seems  to  me 
that this is one of those areas where if you make the initial invest-
ment, you have some upfront costs; we acknowledge that, that you 
do reap a lot of long-term savings. In fact, I think one of the things 
you  talked  about  in  your  statement  a  few  moments  ago,  was  Lex-
ington,  Kentucky  and  that  airport  there,  and  if  I  understand  your 
facts  and  figures  and  the  facts  coming  out  of  Lexington  is  that,  in 
a  little  over  a  year,  a  year  and  a  few  months,  maybe  the  invest-
ment  in  the  in-line  EDS  would  have  paid  for  itself.  Am  I  under-
standing that correctly? 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  Exactly.  They  spent  $3.5  million  to  build  the  in-
line system, and they save $3 million a year, so in the second year, 
you’re making money. 

Senator PRYOR. So, that was my question, if we did make the ini-
tial investment, would we have to, over the long haul, increase the 
security  fees  because  it  seems  that  this  investment  does  pay  for 
itself rather quickly, do you agree with that? 

Mr. BARCLAY. Yes, sir. We’ll do a calculation and get back to the 
Committee  on  what  the  savings  over,  like  a  ten-year  period  would 
be,  and  compare  that  to  what  the  charges  are.  What  we’ve  been 
doing,  mostly,  is  just  trying  to  justify  the  initial  building  in.  You 
can easily cover the $3 to $5 billion—depending on whose estimate 
it  is—to  build  them  in,  but  you  then  earn  the  ongoing  savings  for 
TSA. I mean, in just the airports that have them, I think the num-
bers, I was trying to find them here, went from like 6,500 employ-
ees  down  to  1,400  employees.  It  was  an  enormous  drop  in  employ-
ment, so there are big savings there to be had over time. 

Senator  PRYOR.  I  did  want  to  ask  about  Lexington,  I  don’t  know 
all  the  airports  that  are  participating  in  this,  but  that’s  one  that 
seems  to  be,  you  know  demographically  somewhat  similar  to  the 
two biggest airports in my state at least, a little difference probably 
here  and  there,  but  nonetheless,  some,  a  lot  of  similarities.  And  I 
was  curious  if  there’s  something  about  Lexington  that  makes  it 
unique,  or  could  you  take  that  Lexington  model  and  sort  of  put  it 
across  the  whole  system,  and  apply  what  we’ve  learned  at  Lex-
ington to the whole system. 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  In  fact,  I  was  just  recently  down  at  Little  Rock, 
and  they’ve  got  a  model  in-line  system.  I  don’t  have  the  numbers 
on what it cost and what they saved, but GAO examined just nine 
airports,  and  found  that  at  those  airports,  over  7  years  you’ll  save 
$1.3  billion,  after  you  pay  for  the  cost  of  building,  everything  to 
build them in. So, it is across the system that you get this savings. 
Senator PRYOR. Wait a minute, that’s nine airports, and you save 

$1.3 billion over 7 years? 

Mr.  BARCLAY.  After  you  pay  for  the  cost  of  installing,  so  if  you 
extrapolate that in the system, you’re talking about some big num-
bers.  That’s  why  we’re  saying  it’s  smart  government  to  earn  that 
ongoing  savings  by  doing  upfront  costs.  We’ve  had  some  people  in 
governments  say  to  us,  ‘‘Well  you  airports  should  go  pay  the  cost 
to  build  those  in.’’  And  the  problem  with  that  is  the  savings  go  to 
TSA,  so  you  can’t  tell  one  party  to  absorb  the  capital  costs,  and 
then pass it on to your tenants, while somebody else is getting the 
savings,  you’ve  got  to  connect  up  that  revenue  stream  of  the  sav-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

24

ings. Airports will go out and float bonds to build in these systems 
at the bigger airports, but they need to know they’ve got a revenue 
stream coming in to pay that bond off, but then TSA gets a perma-
nent savings in personnel for doing that. 

Senator PRYOR. OK, well I think we in the Congress need to real-
ly think through that, and like you said, come up with the smartest 
approach  on  that  because  I  think  if  we  are  smart,  we  can  be  effi-
cient and effective at the same time. 

Mr. May, let me ask you now if I may, and I want you to be care-
ful  about  how  you  answer  this  question,  because  you  have  three 
Senators  here  who  have  some  small  airports  in  their  states,  so 
we’re  all  concerned  about  how  what  you  all  do  impacts  small  air-
ports,  and  I’m  an  advocate  for  small  airports  and  smaller  commu-
nities  being  able  to  access  air  travel,  but  how  will  increased  fees 
affect small airports? Affect communities with small airports? 

Mr. MAY. Senator, I’ve never been very good about being careful 
about what I say, and so I guess just being right out with it, there 
is  a  thing—you’re  very  familiar  with  it,  I’m  sure,  called  Essential 
Air  Services—and  there  are  subsidies  that  are  effectively  provided 
to provide service to a lot of small airports. I don’t have to look any 
further  than  what’s  going  on  in  my  industry  today  to  tell  you 
what’s going to happen. The first places that get cut from the serv-
ice  schedule  are  the  places  that  are  the  least  profitable,  and  then 
we  begin  to  cut  back  on  frequency  to  larger  places,  and  all  of  that 
is happening, we’re shutting down hubs, that’s all part of the reor-
ganization of the industry, and I will guarantee you that the people 
who  get  hit  hardest  by  this  tax,  just  in  the  way  it  would  be  col-
lected,  if  you  will,  will  be  people  in  small  communities.  I  will  also 
guarantee  you  that,  to  the  extent  it  has  the  devastating  effect  on 
our industry that we suggest it will, then the next place to go will 
be those least profitable, frequently smaller communities that we’re 
serving  today.  And  it’s  a  pure  economic  choice.  Do  we  eliminate 
service or do we let the company go bankrupt? 

Senator PRYOR. So, not to put words in your mouth, but in sum-
mary, it sounds like what you’re saying is that these increased fees 
may lead, or may be one of the factors in the closure of smaller air-
ports. 

Mr.  MAY.  Senator,  when  you  put  those  words  together,  you  can 

put them in my mouth anytime you want. That’s exactly right. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator, I’m told that the fees now collected, $2.3 
billion,  which  support  about  $23  billion  in  bonding,  assume  that 
you don’t have any of the screening processes for passengers, I was 
going  to  ask  the  question,  whether  there  would  be  the  opposition 
to the fees if we dedicated them to the payment of the bonding for 
the new baggage screening concepts that are before us. 

Mr.  MAY.  I  suspect  that  you  might  have  a  difference  of  opinion 
at  the  table  here  on  that,  Senator.  We  very  firmly  believe  that 
we’re at the max of what we’re paying into the TSA right now, we 
don’t  disagree  that  they  need  to  have  more  equipment,  and  that  it 
needs to have higher volume and that they need to be able to han-
dle  greater  size  of  packages  going  through  for  cargo,  in  particular, 
and greater in-line EDS screening, but we very firmly don’t believe 
that that ought to come out of the hides of the airlines. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

25

Mr.  BARCLAY.  Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  add  that  there  wouldn’t  be 
a  disagreement.  We  do,  again,  think  the  first  place  you  want  to 
look  to  for  the  funding  source  for  building  in-line  are  the  people 
who are going to get the savings end of the cost of their personnel, 
because  that  savings  more  than  pays  back  the  cost  of  building 
them  in.  So,  we  really  should  look  for  a  creative  financing  mecha-
nism  within  government,  because  government’s  going  to  earn  that 
savings, and it’s going to be real and valuable to them in very short 
order, and airports will make it, will use their capital financing ca-
pabilities to make it even easier for government to do that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That  would  be  all  right,  if  we  could  find  what 
portion that we could take away from TSA now to dedicate now to 
those  bonds.  Perhaps  the  next  version  of  ‘‘Aviation  News  Today’’ 
will give us a solution. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. You want another question, Senator? 
Senator INOUYE. I want to make a motion. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Oh,  that’s  right,  I  was  just  going  to  say  this 

hearing is over. 

Senator  INOUYE.  But  before  I  make  a  motion,  I  think  it  should 
be  noted  that  we  are  not  imposing  any  passenger  security  fee  on 
railroad companies. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Chairman,  subject  to  the  presence  of  a 
quorum, and that this motion be operational, after the first vote in 
the  Senate  chamber,  I  move  that  the  Committee  go  into  Executive 
Session  to  consider  the  nominations  of  Maria  Cino  to  be  Deputy 
Secretary of Transportation, Phyllis Sheinberg to be Assistant Sec-
retary  of  Transportation,  Joseph  Boardman  to  be  Administrator  of 
the  Federal  Railroad  Administration,  Nancy  Nord  to  be  Commis-
sioner  of  the  Consumer  Products  Safety  Commission,  and  William 
Cobey to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Washington 
Metropolitan Airport Authority. Will you second the motion? 

Senator PRYOR. Seconded. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much gentlemen, that will mean 
that  after  the  first  vote  on  the  floor  that  takes  place  after  this 
Committee  recesses  today,  we’ll  meet  in  the  President’s  Room  to 
vote  on  Senator  Inouye’s  motion,  that  will  be  to  consider  them  all 
in block, all of the nominations that have been put before the Com-
mittee  by  the  Senator  from  Hawaii,  our  Co-Chairman.  It  will  be 
our intent to hold the usual concept of members making their vote 
in person in the President’s Room. 

We  do  thank  you  very  much,  gentlemen,  I  think  we  should  find 
some  way  to  deal  with  this  question  in  the  next  generation  of 
screening  for  baggage.  That  will  save  some  money,  as  you  indi-
cated,  but  we  have  to  find  somebody  to  put  it  in  before  you  save 
it, and I think we in this Committee should work with you to work 
it out so there isn’t this apparent conflict, and somehow, there has 
to be an answer to that. And we will work with you to do that. 

I  think  also  you  should  know  that  we’re  continuing  our  con-
ferences  with  TSA  on  a  security  basis,  and  on  a  confidential  basis 
to review the whole TSA program, and the classified portion of that 
program,  so  that  we  can  find  some  way  to  reduce  the  costs  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

26

what’s  going  on  now.  We  will  keep  you  informed  of  the  outcome  of 
that. 

Thank you very much, and we will announce our next scheduled 

hearing. 

[Whereupon, at 3:45 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 

Washington, DC, April 25, 2005

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman,
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Co-Chairman,
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Chairman Stevens and Co-Chairman Inouye,

We are writing on behalf of the Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC) con-
cerning  the  proposed  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  budget  for  Fis-
cal  Year  2006.  We  would  like  to  bring  to  your  attention  the  significant  increase  in 
surveillance  funding  requested  by  TSA.  We  ask  that  this  letter  be  included  in  the 
hearing record. 

EPIC strongly opposes this increase in Federal funding for TSA’s surveillance pro-
grams. In its development and implementation of these surveillance programs, TSA 
has  frustrated  efforts  to  obtain  openness  and  transparency  under  the  Freedom  of 
Information  Act,  and  the  agency  has  violated  the  spirit  if  not  the  letter  of  the  Pri-
vacy Act. TSA also has shown a proclivity to using personal information for reasons 
other than the ones for which the information was gathered or volunteered. In addi-
tion,  the  public  has  had  considerable  difficultly  with  the  agency’s  redress  proce-
dures. Furthermore, TSA has shown poor management of its financial resources. 

We  urge  you  to  inquire  what  steps  the  agency  will  take  to  protect  privacy  and 
ensure transparency in data collection and use. We also urge you to scrutinize TSA’s 
current  redress  procedures.  Finally,  we  recommend  against  funding  the  Office  of 
Screening Coordination and Operations. 

President  Bush’s  proposed  budget  would  increase  TSA  spending  by  $156  million 
to  $5.6  billion  for  FY  2006,  but  this  increase  is  contingent  upon  $1.5  billion  that 
will  be  generated  by  a  120  percent  jump  in  security  fees  assessed  to  airline  pas-
sengers. 1 Assistant Secretary David M. Stone defended the increase at the February 
15, 2005, hearing before the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science and Transpor-
tation  saying  air  passengers,  not  the  general  public,  should  pay  for  air  travel  secu-
rity. 2 However,  this  money  will  not  go  toward  new  security  measures,  but  will  re-
place  funds  now  provided  by  the  government  for  current  air  traveler  security  pro-
grams. 3

Assistant  Secretary  Stone  also  testified  that  this  increased  fee  would  mean  ‘‘re-
sources  from  the  general  taxpayer  could  be  used  for  more  broadly  applicable  home-
land security needs,’’ but he did not define what these needs would be. 4 Other pro-
grams under TSA that are receiving an increase in funding in the proposed FY 2006 
budget  include  surveillance  programs  that  have  significant  privacy  implications  for 
tens of millions of American citizens and lawful foreign visitors. 

When it enacted the Privacy Act, 5 U.S.C. § 552a, in 1974, Congress sought to re-
strict the amount of personal information that Federal agencies could collect and re-
quired  agencies  to  be  transparent  in  their  information  practices. 5 The  Privacy  Act 
is intended ‘‘to promote accountability, responsibility, legislative oversight, and open 
government with respect to the use of computer technology in the personal informa-
tion systems and data banks of the Federal Government[.]’’ 6

The  Supreme  Court  as  recently  as  last  year  underscored  the  importance  of  the 
Privacy Act’s restrictions upon agency use of personal information to protect privacy 
interests, noting that:

‘‘[I]n order to protect the privacy of individuals identified in information systems 
maintained  by  Federal  agencies,  it  is  necessary . . . to  regulate  the  collection, 
maintenance,  use,  and  dissemination  of  information  by  such  agencies.’’  Privacy 
Act of 1974, § 2(a)(5), 88 Stat. 1896. The Act gives agencies detailed instructions 

(27)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

28

for  managing  their  records  and  provides  for  various  sorts  of  civil  relief  to  indi-
viduals  aggrieved  by  failures  on  the  Government’s  part  to  comply  with  the  re-
quirements. 7

It is critical for TSA’s programs to adhere to these requirements, as the programs 
have a profound effect on the privacy rights of a large number of American citizens 
and  lawful  foreign  visitors  every  year.  However,  TSA  has  failed  to  follow  the  spirit 
of the Privacy Act during development of these surveillance programs. 
Recent Government Reports Show Problems Within TSA Programs 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  and  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security  Inspector  General  last  month  released  reports  that  were  critical  of  the 
Transportation  Security  Administration. 8 These  reports  highlight  the  agency’s  fail-
ures concerning privacy rights, transparency, and redress procedures. 

The  GAO’s  March  report  examined  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
measures  for  testing  the  use  of  commercial  data  within  Secure  Flight,  the  agency’s 
passenger  prescreening  program  currently  under  development.  The  report,  commis-
sioned  by  Congress,  found  that  the  agency  still  has  many  issues  to  address  before 
the  viability  of  Secure  Flight  can  be  determined. 9 The  GAO  was  unable  to  assess, 
among other things, the effectiveness of the system, the accuracy of intelligence data 
that  will  determine  whether  passengers  may  fly,  safeguards  to  protect  passenger 
privacy,  and  the  adequacy  of  redress  for  passengers  who  are  improperly  flagged  by 
Secure  Flight. 10 The  GAO  specifically  found  that  TSA  ‘‘has  not  yet  clearly  defined 
the privacy impacts of the operational system or all of the actions TSA plans to take 
to mitigate potential impacts.’’ 11

TSA  is  requesting  an  increase  of  $49.3  million  for  its  Secure  Flight  program  to 
bring  its  FY  2006  budget  to  $94  million. 12 The  Secure  Flight  passenger 
prescreening program could affect the tens of millions of citizens who fly every year, 
but in the creation of the program, TSA has frustrated efforts to obtain information 
under  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act,  and  its  actions  concerning  openness  and 
transparency have violated the spirit of the Privacy Act. 

Also  in  March,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  Inspector  General  issued 
findings  on  TSA’s  role  in  collecting  and  disseminating  airline  passenger  data  to 
third  party  agencies  and  companies.  The  report  revealed  that  the  agency  has  been 
involved in 14 transfers of data involving more than 12 million passenger records. 13 
The  Inspector  General  found,  among  other  things,  that  ‘‘TSA  did  not  consistently 
apply  privacy  protections  in  the  course  of  its  involvement  in  airline  passenger  data 
transfers.’’ 14 Furthermore, TSA did not accurately represent to the public the scope 
of its passenger data collection and use. 15

The Inspector General’s critical report comes almost a year after the agency’s ad-
mission  that  it  had  acted  improperly  with  regard  to  passenger  data  collection  and 
use.  In  June  2004  then-TSA  Acting  Administrator  Admiral  David  Stone  admitted 
to  the  Senate  Governmental  Affairs  Committee  that  in  2002  TSA  facilitated  the 
transfer  of  passenger  data  from  American  Airlines,  Continental  Airlines,  Delta  Air-
lines,  America  West  Airlines,  Frontier  Airlines,  and  JetBlue  Airways  to  TSA  ‘‘coop-
erative  agreement  recipients’’  for  purposes  of  CAPPS  II  testing,  as  well  as  to  the 
Secret  Service  and  IBM  for  other  purposes. 16 Stone  also  stated  that  Galileo  Inter-
national  and  ‘‘possibly’’  Apollo,  two  central  airline  reservation  companies,  had  pro-
vided  passenger  data  to  recipients  working  on  behalf  of  TSA. 17 Further,  TSA  di-
rectly obtained passenger data from JetBlue and Sabre, another central airline res-
ervation  company,  for  CAPPS  II  development. 18 TSA  did  not  observe  Privacy  Act 
requirements  with  regard  to  any  of  these  collections  of  personal  information. 19 
Stone’s  admission  followed  repeated  denials  to  the  public,  Congress,  GAO,  and  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  Privacy  Office  that  TSA  had  acquired  or  used  real 
passenger  data  to  test  CAPPS  II. 20 TSA  exhibited  a  proclivity  for  using  personal 
information for reasons other than the ones for which the information was gathered 
or volunteered. 

Another  example  of  TSA’s  failure  to  operate  its  programs  with  the  openness  and 
transparency  necessary  under  the  Federal  open  government  laws  is  its  recent  cre-
ation of an Aviation Security Advisory Committee Secure Flight Privacy/IT Working 
Group. It appears to EPIC that, based upon the little public information that is cur-
rently  available,  the  working  group  is  subject  to  the  Federal  Advisory  Committee 
Act  (FACA),  5  U.S.C.  App.  1,  which  includes  the  requirement  that  the  working 
group publish notices of their meetings in the Federal Register. However, the forma-
tion  of  this  working  group  was  not  announced  in  the  Federal  Register,  and  neither 
TSA nor the Department of Homeland Security has publicly acknowledged its exist-
ence  or  defined  its  mission.  EPIC  sent  a  letter  in  January  to  TSA’s  privacy  officer, 
Lisa Dean, to ask for an explanation as to why this working group is not operating 
with  the  transparency  and  openness  required  under  FACA. 21 In  her  March  re-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

29

sponse  letter,  Ms.  Dean  advised  us  that  Transportation  Security  Administration’s 
position  was  that  the  work  and  materials  of  working  group  are  subject  to  FACA. 22 
The agency was noncommittal about the FOIA status of the material. 23
TSA’s Lapses in Public Accountability 

The  Freedom  of  Information  Act  (FOIA),  5  U.S.C.  § 552,  establishes  a  legal  right 
for  individuals  to  obtain  records  in  the  possession  of  government  agencies.  The 
FOIA helps ensure that the public is fully informed about matters of public concern. 
Government  agencies  are  obligated  to  meet  the  requirements  of  open  government 
and transparency under the FOIA, but TSA has frustrated efforts to obtain informa-
tion under the FOIA during the creation of these surveillance programs. 

In  September  2004,  TSA  announced  plans  to  test  the  Secure  Flight  program.  Se-
cure  Flight  is  intended  to  replace  the  now-defunct  CAPPS  II,  but  it  includes  many 
elements  of  the  CAPPS  II  program,  which  was  abandoned  largely  due  to  privacy 
concerns. 24 TSA said that ‘‘Secure Flight will involve the comparison of information 
for  domestic  flights  to  names  in  the  Terrorist  Screening  Database  (TSDB)  main-
tained  by  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center  (TSC),  to  include  the  expanded  TSA  No-
Fly  and  Selectee  Lists,  in  order  to  identify  individuals  known  or  reasonably  sus-
pected to be engaged in terrorist activity.’’ 25

On September 28, 2004, EPIC submitted a FOIA request to TSA asking for infor-
mation  about  Secure  Flight. 26 EPIC  asked  that  the  request  be  processed  expedi-
tiously,  noting  the  intense  media  interest  surrounding  the  program.  Specifically, 
EPIC  demonstrated  that  485  articles  had  been  published  about  the  program  since 
TSA  announced  its  plans  for  Secure  Flight.  EPIC  also  mentioned  the  October  25, 
2004,  deadline  for  public  comments  on  the  test  phase  of  the  system,  explaining  the 
urgency  for  the  public  to  be  as  well  informed  as  possible  about  Secure  Flight  in 
order to meaningfully respond to the agency’s proposal for the program. TSA deter-
mined  these  circumstances  did  not  justify  the  information’s  immediate  release,  and 
refused EPIC’s request that the information be made public prior to the October 25 
deadline for these comments. TSA also denied EPIC a fee waiver, which the agency 
has never done before in its three-year existence. This maneuver imposed a signifi-
cant  procedural  barrier  to  EPIC’s  ability  to  obtain  the  information.  EPIC  appealed 
TSA’s  decision,  noting  that  the  agency’s  actions  were  unlawful.  Rather  than  defend 
its  position  in  court,  TSA  has  released  a  minimal  amount  of  the  information  that 
EPIC  requested.  EPIC  continues  to  seek  from  TSA  information  about  the  program 
that will affect tens of millions of airline passengers each year. 
Problems With TSA Redress Procedures 

The  recently  enacted  Intelligence  Reform  and  Terrorism  Prevention  Act  of  2004 
directed TSA to create a system for travelers to correct inaccurate information that 
has  caused  their  names  to  be  added  to  the  no-fly  list. 27 TSA  maintains  that  it  has 
an  adequate  redress  process  to  clear  individuals  improperly  flagged  by  watch  lists; 
however,  it  is  well  known  that  individuals  encounter  great  difficulty  in  resolving 
such  problems.  Senators  Ted  Kennedy  (D–MA)  and  Don  Young  (R–AK)  are  among 
the  individuals  who  have  been  improperly  flagged  by  watch  lists. 28 Sen.  Kennedy 
was able to resolve the situation only by enlisting the help of then-Homeland Secu-
rity Secretary Tom Ridge; unfortunately, most people do not have that option. 

In  March,  Rep.  Loretta  Sanchez  (D–CA)  highlighted  problems  that  everyday 
Americans have with the current TSA redress procedure. At a hearing of the House 
Subcommittee  on  Economic  Security,  Infrastructure  Protection,  and  Cybersecurity 
concerning the proposed Fiscal Year 2006 budget, Rep. Sanchez reported that many 
of  her  constituents  continue  to  face  lengthy  delays,  questioning,  and  at  times  are 
prohibited from boarding flights because they are misidentified as people sought on 
no-fly  lists. 29 Her  constituents  continue  to  face  these  roadblocks  even  after  they 
apply for, receive and then display to screener personnel the official Federal Govern-
ment  letters  that  establish  their  innocence.  Rep.  Sanchez  questioned  TSA  officials 
about  why  current  redress  procedures  have  failed  these  American  citizens.  This 
issue remains important, as the GAO’s March report examining Secure Flight found 
that ‘‘TSA has not yet clearly defined how it plans to implement its redress process 
for  Secure  Flight,  such  as  how  errors,  if  identified,  will  be  corrected,  particularly  if 
commercial databases are used.’’ 30
TSA Has Violated the Spirit of Federal Privacy Laws 

The  proposed  FY  2006  budget  accords  TSA’s  Registered  Traveler  program  $22 
million. 31 This  is  a  pilot  program  TSA  began  conducting  in  July  2004  and  is  now 
operating at five airports. 32 The preliminary results are being examined by TSA to 
determine  whether  the  program  should  be  expanded  to  other  airports.  Registered 
Traveler  allows  frequent  travelers  to  submit  digital  fingerprints,  iris  scans  and  un-
dergo a background check in exchange for receiving a fast pass through the airport 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

30

checkpoint. (The International Registered Traveler program was announced in Jan-
uary.) 33

TSA first published a Federal Register notice about the program in June 2004. 34 
In  July  2004,  EPIC  submitted  comments  to  address  the  substantial  privacy  issues 
raised  by  the  Registered  Traveler  program  and  the  new  system  of  records  estab-
lished to facilitate the program. 35 EPIC requested that TSA substantially revise its 
Privacy Act notice prior to implementation of the final phase of Registered Traveler. 
TSA’s subsequent Federal Register notice of the implementations of Privacy Act ex-
emptions  in  the  Registered  Traveler  program  did  not  solve  any  the  privacy  right 
threats that EPIC highlighted in its comments. 

TSA’s  notice  for  the  Registered  Traveler  system  of  records,  however,  exempts  the 
system from many protections the Privacy Act is intended to provide. 36 As proposed 
in the notice, Registered Traveler is a program for which TSA is asking individuals 
to  volunteer  information  that  will  be  used  to  conduct  potentially  invasive  back-
ground  checks  in  exchange  for  the  determination  that  they  have  a  relatively  low 
likelihood  of  being  terrorists  or  connected  to  terrorists,  and  may  be  subject  to  less 
security  screening  than  others  prior  to  boarding  airplanes.  However,  TSA  has  un-
necessarily exempted the system from crucial safeguards intended to promote record 
accuracy  and  secure  the  privacy  of  individuals  whose  information  is  maintained 
within the system. TSA will be under no legal obligation to inform the public of the 
categories  of  information  contained  in  the  system  or  provide  the  ability  to  access 
and  correct  records  that  are  irrelevant,  untimely  or  incomplete.  The  program  will 
contain  information  that  is  unnecessary  and  wholly  irrelevant  to  the  determination 
of whether an individual poses a threat to aviation security. 
Questions  Remain  About  the  Transportation  Worker  Identity  Credential 

Program 

TSA  is  requesting  $244  million  for  its  pilot  Transportation  Worker  Identity  Cre-
dential  program  (TWIC)  for  FY  2006. 37 TWIC  is  an  identification  card  given  to 
transportation  workers,  authorized  visitors  and  all  other  persons  requiring 
unescorted  access  to  transportation  infrastructure  secure  areas.  The  program  is  op-
erating  at  34  sites  in  six  states,  but  TSA  hopes  to  eventually  extend  the  program 
to workers in all modes of transportation, which could encompass as many as 6 mil-
lion people. 38 Persons required to have the identification card submit sensitive per-
sonal  and  biometric  information  to  a  central  TSA  database  used  to  validate  a  per-
son’s eligibility to access these areas. EPIC submitted comments in November 2004 
highlighting the dangers to travelers’ privacy rights inherent in the program. 39 TSA 
has not released information clearly explaining to the public how it intends to safe-
guard  the  sensitive  personal  information  gathered  on  program  participants.  The 
lack of transparency and openness about TWIC is against the spirit of Federal open 
government laws. 

Another  important  reason  not  to  increase  the  funding  for  TWIC  is  because  TSA 
has not used its current funding judiciously. The GAO reviewed TWIC in December 
2004,  and  found  that  because  of  program  delays,  some  port  facilities  are  forced  to 
proceed ‘‘with plans for local or regional identification cards that may require addi-
tional investment in order to make them compatible with the TWIC system. Accord-
ingly,  delays  in  the  program  may  affect  enhancements  to  port  security  and  com-
plicate stakeholder’s efforts in making wise investment decisions regarding security 
infrastructure.’’ 40

The  financial  problems  encountered  in  TSA’s  TWIC  program  are  emblematic  of 
TSA’s troubles managing its finances, according to the GAO. Cathleen Berrick, GAO 
Director  of  Homeland  Security  and  Justice,  told  the  Senate  Committee  on  Com-
merce, Science, and Transportation on February 15, 2005, that TSA had not always 
‘‘conducted  the  systematic  analysis  needed  to  inform  its  decision-making  processes 
and to prioritize its security improvements.’’ 41 Examples include the fact that in FY 
2005, TSA was forced to transfer about $61 million from its Research and Develop-
ment  budget  of  $110  million,  to  support  its  operations,  such  as  personnel  costs  for 
screeners. 42

A  significant  issue  is  that  these  surveillance  programs  are  receiving  substantial 
funding  and  TSA  manpower  while  the  current  aviation  program  to  screen  pas-
sengers and their luggage for dangerous objects is woefully inadequate. Ms. Berrick 
reported  at  the  February  15  hearing  that  there  has  been  only  modest  progress  in 
how  well  screeners  detect  threat  objects  following  a  report  last  year  that  docu-
mented  gaps  in  screener  security. 43 The  increased  funds  that  TSA  has  earmarked 
for  surveillance  programs  can  also  be  used  in  another  important  program:  Threat 
Assessment  of  General  Aviation.  The  GAO  reported  that  ‘‘though  the  Federal  Bu-
reau of Investigation has said that terrorists have considered using general aviation 
to  conduct  attacks,  a  systematic  assessment  of  threats  has  not  been  conducted.’’ 44 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

31

TSA has cited cost as the reason that TSA has conducted vulnerability assessments 
at only a small number of the 19,000 general aviation airports nationwide. 
Office  of  Screening  Coordination  and  Operations  Raises  New  Privacy

Problems 

The Department of Homeland Security (DHS) has proposed the creation and fund-
ing of the Office of Screening Coordination and Operations (SCO), which would over-
see  vast  databases  of  digital  fingerprints  and  photographs,  eye  scans  and  personal 
information from millions of Americans and foreigners. This office would be respon-
sible  for  United  States-Visitor  and  Immigrant  Status  Indicator  Technology  (US–
VISIT),  Free  and  Secure  Trade,  NEXUS/Secure  Electronic  Network  for  Travelers 
Rapid  Inspection,  TWIC,  Registered  Traveler,  Hazardous  Materials  Trucker  Back-
ground  Checks,  and  Alien  Flight  School  Checks. 45 This  mass  compilation  of  per-
sonal  information  has  inherent  dangers  to  citizens’  privacy  rights  and  it  is  impera-
tive  that  SCO  fulfill  its  legal  obligations  for  openness  and  transparency  under  the 
FOIA and Privacy Act. 

According  to  the  proposed  FY  2006  budget,  the  mission  of  the  proposed  SCO  is 
‘‘to  enhance  the  interdiction  of  terrorists  and  the  instruments  of  terrorism  by 
streamlining  terrorist-related  screening  by  comprehensive  coordination  of  proce-
dures  that  detect,  identify,  track,  and  interdict  people,  cargo  and  conveyances,  and 
other  entities  and  objects  that  pose  a  threat  to  homeland  security.’’ 46 The  budget 
goes on to say that ‘‘the SCO would produce processes that will be effected in a man-
ner that safeguards legal rights, including freedoms, civil liberties, and information 
privacy  guaranteed  by  Federal  law.’’ 47 It  is  unclear,  however,  what  steps  the  office 
intends to take to protect these rights. 

There  is  a  significant  risk  that  the  creation  and  funding  of  the  SCO  would  allow 
for  mission  creep—a  risk  that  the  data  collected  and  volunteered  by  airline  pas-
sengers, transportation workers and foreign visitors will be used for reasons not re-
lated to their original aviation security purposes. Though TSA has stated that it will 
not use the sensitive personal data of tens of millions of Americans for non-aviation 
security  purposes,  TSA  documents  about  the  CAPPS  II  program  collected  by  EPIC 
under  the  FOIA  clearly  show  that  TSA  had  considered  using  personal  information 
gathered  for  CAPPS  II  for  reasons  beyond  its  original  purposes.  For  example,  TSA 
stated  that  CAPPS  II  personal  data  might  be  disclosed  to  Federal,  state,  local,  for-
eign, or international agencies for their investigations of statute, rule, regulation or 
order violations. 48 Again, TSA exhibited a proclivity for using personal information 
for  reasons  other  than  the  ones  for  which  the  information  was  gathered  or  volun-
teered. 

The Transportation Security Administration has frustrated efforts to ensure open-
ness  and  transparency  under  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act  and  has  violated  the 
spirit  of  the  Privacy  Act  for  the  protection  of  privacy  rights  in  the  development  of 
the above programs. TSA also has shown a proclivity for using personal information 
for  reasons  other  than  the  ones  for  which  the  information  was  gathered  or  volun-
teered.  The  agency’s  current  redress  procedures  have  failed  to  resolve  valid  griev-
ances of innocent citizens flagged by the no-fly lists. TSA also has shown poor man-
agement  of  its  financial  resources.  For  these  reasons,  EPIC  strongly  opposes  the 
sharp  increase  in  funding  for  TSA’s  surveillance  programs  proposed  in  the  presi-
dent’s  FY  2006  budget,  and  specifically  opposes  funding  of  the  Office  of  Screening 
Coordination and Operations. 

Thank you for your consideration of these issues. 

Sincerely yours, 

MARC ROTENBERG, 

Executive Director.

MARCIA HOFMANN, 

Director, Open Government Project.

MELISSA NGO, 

Staff Counsel.

ENDNOTES 

1 Transportation  Security  Administration  Statement  of  Assistant  Secretary  David 
M. Stone Before the Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation (Feb. 15, 
2005). 

2 Id. at 6. 
3 Id. 
4 Id. 
5 S. Rep. No. 93–1183, at 1 (1974). 
6 Id. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

32

7 Doe v. Chao, 540 U.S. 614, 618 (2004). 
8 Government Accountability Office, Secure Flight Development and Testing Under 
Way,  but  Risks  Should  Be  Managed  as  System  Is  Further  Developed,  GAO–05–356 
(March 2005) (hereinafter ‘‘GAO Report’’). Department of Homeland Security Inspec-
tor General, Review of the Transportation Security Administration’s Role in the Use 
and  Dissemination  of  Airline  Passenger  Data  (Redacted),  OIG–05–12  (March  2005) 
(‘‘OIG Report’’). 

9 GAO  Report,  supra  at  53.  See  generally  EPIC’s  Secure  Flight  page  at  http://

www.epic.org/privacy/airtravel/secureflight.html. 

10 GAO Report, supra at 53–62. 
11 Id. at 7. 
12 Department  of  Homeland  Security,  Budget-in-Brief  Fiscal  Year  2006,  at  21 

(Feb. 7, 2005) (‘‘DHS Budget’’). 
13 OIG Report, supra at 6–7. 
14 Id. at 40. 
15 Id. at 42–48. 
16 See  U.S.  Senate  Committee  on  Governmental  Affairs  Pre-hearing  Questionnaire 
for  the  Nomination  of  Admiral  David  Stone  to  be  Assistant  Secretary  of  Homeland 
Security,  Transportation  Security  Administration  17,  19,  available  at  http://
www.epic.org/privacy/airtravel/stonelanswers.pdf. 

17 Id. 
18 Id. at 19. 
19 Id. at 18. 
20 See,  e.g.,  Ryan  Singel,  More  False  Information  From  TSA,  Wired  News,  June 
23,  2004  (‘‘After  the  JetBlue  transfer  was  brought  to  public  attention  in  September 
2003, TSA spokesman Brian Turmail told Wired News that the TSA had never used 
passenger  records  for  testing  CAPPS  II,  nor  had  it  provided  records  to  its  contrac-
tors. In September 2003, Wired News asked TSA spokesman Nico Melendez whether 
the TSA’s four contractors had used real passenger records to test and develop their 
systems. Melendez denied it, saying,‘‘ ‘We have only used dummy data to this point.’ 
’’);  U.S.  Representative  John  Mica  (R–FL)  Holds  Hearing  on  Airline  Passenger 
Profiling  Proposal:  Hearing  Before  the  Aviation  Subcomm.  of  the  House  Transpor-
tation  and  Infrastructure  Comm.,  105th  Cong.  (March  2004)  (Admiral  Stone  testi-
fying  that  CAPPS  II  testing  was  likely  to  begin  in  June  2004);  GAO  Report  at  17 
(‘‘TSA  has  only  used  32  simulated  passenger  records—created  by  TSA  from  the 
itineraries  of  its  employees  and  contractor  staff  who  volunteered  to  provide  the 
data—to  conduct  [CAPPS  II]  testing’’);  Department  of  Homeland  Security  Privacy 
Office, Report to the Public on Events Surrounding jetBlue Data Transfer (Feb. 2004) 
8  (‘‘At  this  time,  there  is  no  evidence  that  CAPPS  II  testing  has  taken  place  using 
passenger data’’). 

21 Letter  from  David  Sobel,  General  Counsel,  EPIC,  and  Marcia  Hofmann,  Staff 
Counsel  and  Director,  Open  Government  Project,  EPIC,  to  Lisa  Dean,  Privacy  Offi-
cer, Office of Transportation Security Policy, TSA, Jan. 31, 2005 (on file with EPIC). 
22 Letter from Lisa S. Dean, Privacy Officer, Office of Transportation Security Pol-
icy, TSA, to David Sobel, General Counsel, EPIC, Mar. 2, 2005 (on file with EPIC.) 

23 Id. 
24 See Sara Kehaulani Goo and Robert O’Harrow Jr., New Screening System Post-

poned, Washington Post, July 16, 2004, at A02. 

24, 2004). 

25 System of Records Notice, Secure Flight Test Records, 69 Fed. Reg. 57345 (Sept. 

26 Letter from Marcia Hofmann, Staff Counsel, EPIC, to Patricia Reip-Dice, Asso-
ciate  Director,  FOIA  Headquarters  Office,  TSA,  Sept.  28,  2004  (on  file  with  EPIC). 

27 P.L. No. 108–458 (2004). 
28 See, e.g., Sara Kehaulani Goo, Committee Chairman Runs Into Watch-List Prob-
lem,  Washington  Post,  Sept.  30,  3004;  Leslie  Miller,  House  Transportation  Panel 
Chairman Latest to be Stuck on No-Fly List, Associated Press, Sept. 29, 2004; Rich-
ard  Simon,  Iconic  Senator  Is  Suspicious  to  Zealous  Airport  Screeners,  Los  Angeles 
Times,  Aug.  20,  2004;  Shaun  Waterman,  Senator  Gets  a  Taste  of  No-Fly  List  Prob-
lems, United Press International, Aug. 20, 2004. 

29 Shaun Waterman, No Redress Mechanism in New DHS Terrorist Screening Of-

fice, United Press International, Mar. 2, 2005. 

30 GAO Report, supra at 7. 
31 DHS Budget, supra at 21. 
32 Press  Release,  U.S.  Department  of  Homeland  Security  TSA,  Secretary  Ridge 
Unveils  Registered  Traveler  Pilot  Program  At  Reagan  National  Airport  (Sept.  3, 
2004). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

33

33 Press Release, U.S. Department of Homeland Security, Secretary Tom Ridge An-
nounces Enhancement of Expedited Traveler Program Through New York’s JFK Air-
port (Jan. 13, 2005). 

34 Privacy Act Notice, 69 Fed. Reg. 30948 (June 1, 2004). 
35 Comments of the Electronic Privacy Information Center on Registered Traveler 
Operations  Files  Privacy  Act  Notice,  June  1,  2004,  available  at  http://
www.epic.org/privacy/airtravel/rtlcomments.pdf. 

36 Privacy Act Notice, 69 Fed. Reg. 54256 (Sept. 8, 2004). 
37 DHS Budget, supra at 21. 
38 TSA’s fact sheet on the Registered Traveler program, available at www.tsa.gov/

interweb/assetlibrary/RTlFactsheet.pdf. 

39 Comments  of  the  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center  on  Transportation  Se-
curity  Threat  Assessment  System  and  Transportation  Worker  Identification 
Credentialing  System  Privacy  Act  Notice,  Sept.  24,  2004,  available  at  http://
www.epic.org/privacy/airtravel/twiclcomments.pdf. 

40 Government  Accountability  Office,  Transportation  Security:  Systematic  Plan-
ning  Needed  to  Optimize  Resources,  Statement  of  Cathleen  A.  Berrick,  Director 
Homeland Security and Justice, GAO–05–357T (Feb. 15, 2005). 

41 Id. at 2. 
42 Id. at 31. 
43 Id. at 11. 
44 Id. at 17. 
45 DHS Budget, supra at 6. 
46 DHS Budget, supra at 19. 
47 Id. 
48 Transportation  Security  Administration,  Department  of  Homeland  Security, 
Draft Privacy Impact Statements (CAPPS II), April 17, 2003, July 29, 2003, and July 
30,  2003,  obtained  by  EPIC  through  FOIA  litigation,  available  at  http://
www.epic.org/privacy/airtravel/profiling.html.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  13:39 Oct 02, 2006 Jkt 030055 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\30055.TXT JACKF PsN: JACKF

